2006  NOBEL  LAUREATES 

S.  HRG.  110–1209 

HEARING 

BEFORE THE 

SUBCOMMITTEE ON SCIENCE, TECHNOLOGY, 

AND INNOVATION 

OF THE 

COMMITTEE ON COMMERCE, 

SCIENCE, AND TRANSPORTATION 

UNITED STATES SENATE 
ONE  HUNDRED  TENTH  CONGRESS 

FIRST  SESSION 

MAY  2,  2007 

Printed  for  the  use  of  the  Committee  on  Commerce,  Science,  and  Transportation 

( 

79–907 PDF 

WASHINGTON  : 

2013 

U.S.  GOVERNMENT  PRINTING  OFFICE

For sale by the Superintendent of Documents, U.S. Government Printing Office

Internet: bookstore.gpo.gov Phone: toll free (866) 512–1800; DC area (202) 512–1800

Fax: (202) 512–2104 Mail: Stop IDCC, Washington, DC 20402–0001

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:23 Mar 19, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00001 Fmt 5011 Sfmt 5011 S:\GPO\DOCS\79907.TXT JACKIE

SENATE  COMMITTEE  ON  COMMERCE,  SCIENCE,  AND  TRANSPORTATION 

ONE  HUNDRED  TENTH  CONGRESS 

FIRST  SESSION 

DANIEL  K.  INOUYE,  Hawaii,  Chairman 

JOHN  D.  ROCKEFELLER  IV,  West  Virginia 
JOHN  F.  KERRY,  Massachusetts 
BYRON  L.  DORGAN,  North  Dakota 
BARBARA  BOXER,  California 
BILL  NELSON,  Florida 
MARIA  CANTWELL,  Washington 
FRANK  R.  LAUTENBERG,  New  Jersey 
MARK  PRYOR,  Arkansas 
THOMAS  R.  CARPER,  Delaware 
CLAIRE  MCCASKILL,  Missouri 
AMY  KLOBUCHAR,  Minnesota 

TED  STEVENS,  Alaska,  Vice  Chairman 
JOHN  MCCAIN,  Arizona 
TRENT  LOTT,  Mississippi 
KAY  BAILEY  HUTCHISON,  Texas 
OLYMPIA  J.  SNOWE,  Maine 
GORDON  H.  SMITH,  Oregon 
JOHN  ENSIGN,  Nevada 
JOHN  E.  SUNUNU,  New  Hampshire 
JIM  DEMINT,  South  Carolina 
DAVID  VITTER,  Louisiana 
JOHN  THUNE,  South  Dakota 

MARGARET L.  CUMMISKY,  Democratic  Staff  Director  and  Chief  Counsel 

LILA HARPER HELMS,  Democratic  Deputy  Staff  Director  and  Policy  Director 

CHRISTINE D.  KURTH,  Republican  Staff  Director  and  General  Counsel 

KENNETH R.  NAHIGIAN,  Republican  Deputy  Staff  Director  and  Chief  Counsel 

SUBCOMMITTEE  ON  SCIENCE,  TECHNOLOGY,  AND  INNOVATION 

JOHN  F.  KERRY,  Massachusetts,  Chairman 
JOHN  D.  ROCKEFELLER  IV,  West  Virginia 
BYRON  L.  DORGAN,  North  Dakota 
BARBARA  BOXER,  California 
MARIA  CANTWELL,  Washington 
MARK  PRYOR,  Arkansas 
CLAIRE  MCCASKILL,  Missouri 
AMY  KLOBUCHAR,  Minnesota 

JOHN  ENSIGN,  Nevada,  Ranking 
JOHN  MCCAIN,  Arizona 
KAY  BAILEY  HUTCHISON,  Texas 
GORDON  H.  SMITH,  Oregon 
JOHN  E.  SUNUNU,  New  Hampshire 
JIM  DEMINT,  South  Carolina 
JOHN  THUNE,  South  Dakota 

(II) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:23 Mar 19, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00002 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\GPO\DOCS\79907.TXT JACKIE

Page 
1 
3 
30 
1 
2 
2 

10 
10 
4 
6 
15 
15 

13 
13 

18 
19 

35 

C O N T E N T S 

Hearing held on May 2, 2007 
.................................................................................
Statement of Senator Boxer  ....................................................................................
Statement of Senator Klobuchar  ............................................................................
Statement of Senator Pryor  ....................................................................................
Statement of Senator Stevens 
................................................................................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................

WITNESSES 

sity School of Medicine 

Fire,  Dr.  Andrew,  Departments  of  Pathology  and  Genetics,  Stanford  Univer-
........................................................................................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Kornberg, Dr. Roger, Winzer Professor in Medicine, Stanford University  .........
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Mather, Dr. John C., Chief Scientist, Science Mission Directorate, NASA  ........
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Mello,  Ph.D.,  Craig  C.,  Howard  Hughes  Medical  Institute  Investigator  and 
the Blais University Chair in Molecular Medicine, University of Massachu-
setts Medical School  .............................................................................................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Smoot,  Ph.D.,  George,  Senior  Scientist,  Lawrence  Berkeley  National  Labora-
.........................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................

tory, Professor of Physics, University of California, Berkeley 

Response  to  written  questions  submitted  by  Hon.  Mark  Pryor  to  Dr.  Roger 
Kornberg  ...............................................................................................................

APPENDIX 

(III) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:23 Mar 19, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00003 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\GPO\DOCS\79907.TXT JACKIE

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:23 Mar 19, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00004 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\GPO\DOCS\79907.TXT JACKIE

2006  NOBEL  LAUREATES 

WEDNESDAY,  MAY  2,  2007 

SUBCOMMITTEE ON SCIENCE, TECHNOLOGY, AND INNOVATION,
COMMITTEE ON COMMERCE, SCIENCE, AND TRANSPORTATION, 

U.S. SENATE, 

The  Subcommittee  met,  pursuant  to  notice,  at  4:02  p.m.  in  room 
SR–253,  Russell  Senate  Office  Building,  Hon.  Mark  Pryor,  pre-
siding. 

Washington, DC. 

OPENING STATEMENT OF HON. MARK PRYOR, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM ARKANSAS 

Senator  PRYOR.  The  Committee  will  come  to  order,  and  we  will 
have  probably  at  least  one  or  two  more  Senators  come  and  go.  We 
have  a  very  busy  Committee  schedule  today  on  the  Senate  side. 
But, on behalf of Chairman Inouye and Vice Chairman Stevens and 
Senators  Kerry,  Ensign,  and  Boxer,  and  the  Science,  Technology, 
and  Innovation  Subcommittee,  I  would  like  to  welcome  our  distin-
guished  guests  and  the  2006  Nobel  Laureates  in  Chemistry,  Medi-
cine, and Physics. 

Taken  together,  these  gentlemen  represent  the  first  American 
sweep  of  the  science  Nobel  Prize  categories  since  1983.  Their 
achievement will, I hope, inspire young people to study science and 
inspire  policymakers  to  rededicate  themselves  to  preserving  Amer-
ica’s role as the world’s preeminent scientific nation. 

For the past half-century, the United States’ investment in basic 
research  has  been  the  engine  that  drives  our  economy.  In  1945, 
Vannevar  Bush  submitted  his  report,  ‘‘Science:  The  Endless  Fron-
tier,’’ to President Franklin Delano Roosevelt that spurred the cre-
ation of a system of public support for university research that en-
dures to this day. 

The  goal  of  basic  research  is  to  discover  new  scientific  ideas, 
principles, and theories. Nobody can predict the next breakthrough 
in science; however, the connection between basic research and the 
economy  is  straightforward.  Basic  research  produces  the  discov-
eries that, through innovation, become the products that transform 
and strengthen our economy. 

The  American  Association  for  the  Advancement  of  Science  re-
ports  that  the  overall  Federal  investment  in  research  and  develop-
ment  would  increase  to  $143  billion  in  Fiscal  Year  2008.  However, 
in a repeat of past budgets, the continuing administration priorities 
of  weapons  and  space  vehicles  development  would  take  up  the  en-
tire increase, and more. Funding for the basic and applied research 

(1) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:23 Mar 19, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00005 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\GPO\DOCS\79907.TXT JACKIE

2 

portion  of  the  R&D  portfolio  would  actually  fall  by  2.1  percent,  to 
$55.5 billion. 

As a percentage of GDP, the U.S. Federal investment in physical 
sciences  and  engineering  research  has  dropped  by  half  since  1970. 
Gains by NSF, NIST, and the DOE Office of Science would be more 
than offset by cuts in other research agencies, such as the National 
Institutes  of  Health.  These  investments,  while  welcome,  overall, 
raise  the  question  of  whether  the  United  States  will  continue  to 
make  the  sufficiently  balanced  investment  necessary  to  maintain 
its  own  capacity  for  scientific  discovery  and  technological  innova-
tion  and  remain  a  leading  player  in  an  increasingly  competitive 
global marketplace. 

Last  week,  the  U.S.  Senate  passed  S.  761,  the  America  COM-
PETES  Act.  This  bill  is  based  heavily  on  the  recommendations  of 
the  National  Academies’  report,  ‘‘Rising  Above  the  Gathering 
Storm.’’ I’m proud to be a cosponsor of the legislation. The America 
COMPETES  Act  calls  for  a  doubling  of  the  basic  research  budgets 
of  the  National  Science  Foundation,  National  Institute  of  Stand-
ards  and  Technology,  and  Department  of  Energy  Office  of  Science. 
I  hope  that  this  legislation  will  begin  to  restore  our  science  re-
search infrastructure and competitive edge. 

I look forward to working with Chairman Inouye and Vice Chair-
man  Stevens,  to  incorporate  the  recommendations  that  we  hear 
today as we move forward on the bill. 

Now,  I  would  like  to  turn  the  program  over  to  the  Vice  Chair, 
Senator  Stevens  of  Alaska,  and  let  him  make  some  opening  state-
ments. 

STATEMENT OF HON. TED STEVENS, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM ALASKA 

Senator STEVENS. Thank you very much, Mr. Chairman. 
I’ve been honored to be with these gentlemen earlier today. I will 
put  my  statement  in  the  record  and  will  look  forward  to  hearing 
from them here again. 

[The prepared statement of Senator Stevens follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF HON. TED STEVENS, U.S. SENATOR FROM ALASKA 

Mr.  Chairman,  thank  you  for  holding  this  hearing  today.  It  is  quite  a  privilege 

to be able to hear from some of the brightest scientific minds in the world. 

It has been more than 20 years since Americans have won Nobel Prizes for medi-
cine,  chemistry,  and  physics  all  in  the  same  year.  I  would  like  to  congratulate  all 
of the witnesses for their remarkable achievements. From the microscopic to the as-
tronomical, the research conducted by these individuals is remarkable and will fur-
ther advance the knowledge of our world for years to come. 

Groundbreaking  basic  research  is  the  cornerstone  of  technology  and  societal 
progress. This type of research helps to improve the health of our people, stimulate 
our  economy,  preserve  our  environment,  and  strengthen  the  national  defense  over 
the long-term. 

The  continued  funding  of  basic  research  is  critical  to  maintaining  the  United 
States’  competitive  edge  in  the  world.  By  focusing  our  efforts  to  support  basic  re-
search  through  the  National  Science  Foundation,  the  National  Institute  of  Stand-
ards and Technology, and the National Labs, we are investing in more bright minds 
and  new  ideas  that  will  help  to  ensure  that  future  innovations  that  transform  the 
world  will  originate  here  in  the  United  States.  By  supporting  and  improving  the 
teaching  of  science,  technology,  engineering,  and  mathematics,  we  are  also  encour-
aging  the  next  generation  of  American  students  to  follow  the  example  of  today’s 
Nobel Laureates. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:23 Mar 19, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00006 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\79907.TXT JACKIE

3 

Last Wednesday, with the passage of the bipartisan America COMPETES Act, the 
Senate  sent  a  clear  message  that  our  Nation’s  competitiveness  is  a  major  priority 
that  must  be  addressed  as  soon  as  possible.  I  was  pleased  to  play  a  major  role  in 
developing this legislation to increase funding for basic research, strengthen science, 
technology, engineering, and math education, and develop a 21st century innovation 
infrastructure.  I  hope  that  we  will  be  able  to  get  this  bill  signed  into  law  as  soon 
as possible. 

Once again, I look forward to hearing from all of our witnesses today. 
Thank you. 

Senator  PRYOR.  Thank  you.  Well,  you  said  you  were  going  to  be 

brief. And that’s right, isn’t it? 

I’d  like  to  introduce  two  of  our  Nobel  Laureates,  and  then  Sen-
ator  Boxer  will  introduce  the  three  Nobel  Laureates  from  Cali-
fornia. 

Let’s  see,  Dr.  Craig  Mello  holds  the  Blais  University  Chair  in 
Molecular  Medicine  at  the  University  of  Massachusetts  Medical 
School.  He  was  awarded  the  Nobel  Prize  in  Medicine  for  his  work 
on RNA interference. 

Dr.  John  Mather  is  the  Chief  Scientist  at  NASA,  and  is  the  co- 
recipient  of  the  Nobel  Prize  in  Physics.  Dr.  Mather  was  instru-
mental in the development of the Cosmic Background Explorer that 
measured the residual heat radiation from the Big Bang. 

We’d also like to recognize Dr. Jack Wilson, the President of the 

University of Massachusetts, who’s in attendance today. 

Senator Boxer? 

STATEMENT OF HON. BARBARA BOXER, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM CALIFORNIA 

Senator BOXER. Thank you so much, Mr. Chairman. 
Let  me  apologize  in  advance  to  you,  Senator  Stevens,  and  our 
witnesses, because I have other Committee work, but I just had to 
come  over  here  to  introduce  to  the  Committee  three  of  the  finest 
minds, I’m sure, out of the five that are all the finest minds in the 
world. My three, George Smoot, Roger Kornberg, and Andrew Fire, 
all  are  Californians,  and  all  are  2006  Nobel  Prize  winners.  I  take 
great pride in the fact, and I know Senator Feinstein does as well, 
that  these  three  Californians  were  among  the  five  Americans  who 
swept  the  Nobel  Prize  science  awards  last  year,  as  our  Chairman 
has  said,  something  that  hasn’t  happened  in  more  than  20  years. 
I will start with Dr. Smoot, who shared the Nobel Prize in Phys-
ics.  He’s  been  a  professor  at  the  University  of  California  at  Berke-
ley,  in  the  Lawrence  Berkeley  National  Lab,  since  1970.  In  the 
years since, he and his team have been dedicated to understanding 
the  origin  of  galaxies  and  stars,  and  to  getting  a  glimpse  of  what 
the  universe  looked  like  in  its  infancy,  when  it  was  only  about 
300,000  to  400,000  years  old.  Dr.  Smoot  told  my  staff  that  he  had 
so many questions when he looked up into the night sky as a young 
boy. It’s such a joy to see that he’s continued searching for the an-
swers, and, in turn, he has taught us all so much. 

Roger  Kornberg,  winner  of  the  Nobel  Prize  for  Chemistry,  has 
been Winzer Professor in Medicine and Structural Biology at Stan-
ford since 1978. While Dr. Smoot looked to the sky and asked ques-
tions, Professor Kornberg looked down into a microscope to explore 
the building blocks of life. He has worked over the years to discover 
and  describe  the  process  of  how  genetic  information  is  copied  from 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:23 Mar 19, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00007 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\79907.TXT JACKIE

4 

DNA inside a cell’s nucleus and then transferred out to the rest of 
the  cell  so  that  proteins  can  construct  the  organism  and  allow  it 
to  function.  Working  with  his  team,  he  developed  highly  detailed 
pictures that describe this copying process known as transcription, 
and the applications of this work have fundamental medical impor-
tance. 

Andrew Fire, who shared the Nobel Prize in Physiology, or Medi-
cine, is Professor of Pathology and Genetics at Stanford, where he’s 
been  since  2003.  Professor  Fire  and  his  colleague  Craig  Mello,  of 
the  University  of  Massachusetts  Medical  School,  led  a  team  that 
discovered  certain  molecules,  as  my  Chairman  has  explained,  that 
discovered  that  certain  molecules  can  be  used  to  turn  off  specific 
genes  in  animal  cells.  And  this  marked  the  first  time  biologists 
were  able  to  selectively  silence  the  voice  of  one  gene  among  the 
tens of thousands that give a cell its instructions from development 
to death. 

Like  Dr.  Kornberg’s  discoveries  regarding  the  transfer  of  genetic 
information  from  DNA  to  the  rest  of  the  cell,  Dr.  Fire’s  work  has 
tremendous medical implications, because treatments based on the 
ability  to  ID  and  silence  a  gene  are  being  tested  in  many  animal 
models  of  disease—high  cholesterol,  HIV,  cancer,  and  hepatitis, 
among others—and clinical trials have been launched. 

Mr.  Chairman,  these  giants  of  science  are  here  today  to  talk 
about  the  importance  of  basic  science  research.  The  great  discov-
eries  of  tomorrow  come  when  the  greatest  minds  are  given  the  re-
sources to do their work. And I know we all want to help them get 
those resources. 

So, I want to thank you for this hearing and for the opportunity 
you’ve given me to introduce these great Californians, and to meet 
them all. 

Senator  PRYOR.  Thank  you.  Senator  Boxer,  thank  you.  And  we 

understand that you’re going in different directions today, so—— 

Senator BOXER. I’ll be here for a while. 
Senator  PRYOR.  Thank  you  for  being  here.  And  I  know  that  the 

panel appreciates it, as well. 

Gentlemen,  your  accomplishments  are  great,  and  we  are  very 
honored  to  have  you  here  today  in  the  United  States  Senate.  And 
I  understand  that  there’s  a  speaking  order,  but  I  guess  the  group 
has talked and decided that you don’t really need to make opening 
statements.  Is  that  right?  So,  why  don’t  we  do  this,  why  don’t  we 
just go down the row, if that’s OK, and just let you introduce your-
selves, say a couple of sentences, and then we’ll start our questions 
and answers. How does that sound? 

Would you like to start? 

STATEMENT OF DR. ROGER KORNBERG, WINZER PROFESSOR 

IN MEDICINE, STANFORD UNIVERSITY 

Dr. KORNBERG. So, I’m Roger Kornberg—— 
Senator  PRYOR.  And,  I’m  sorry,  there’s  a  microphone  there.  Just 

make sure it’s on. 

Dr. KORNBERG. Oh, now it’s on. Can I be heard? 
I’m Roger Kornberg, from Stanford University, and I understand 
that we won’t make the statement that we prepared, so I’ll confine 
most of my remarks to the discussion that follows. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:23 Mar 19, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00008 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\79907.TXT JACKIE

5 

I did, however, want to comment on one aspect, in case it doesn’t 
arise, and which I think is of critical importance, and it is that all 
of  our  work  over  the  years  was  supported  by  NIH.  The  cost  was 
about  $20  million  over  30  years,  mostly  used  for  the  stipends  of 
more  than  80  graduate  and  postdoctoral  students.  Due  to  current 
constraints  on  the  NIH  budget,  I  can  tell  you  that  virtually  none 
of  the  work  we  did  then  would  be  supported  today.  I  can  tell  you 
that  a  finding  I  made  in  1974,  of  great  importance,  of  a  funda-
mental  particle  of  the  chromosome  would  certainly  not  be  success-
ful in the competition for a research grant. And the reason is, I had 
no  idea  at  the  outset  what  I  might  find,  and  I  had  no  idea  how  to 
go about it. I only knew that the problem was important and could 
try  and  advance  reasons  why  I  should  be  given  the  opportunity  of 
doing so. 

In  a  similar  way,  the  work  on  RNA  polymerase  structure,  for 
which the Prize was given, was only supported by NIH after it be-
came clear the work would succeed. When we began, the prospects 
for  success  were  virtually  nil.  There  was  no  way  of  producing  the 
RNA polymerase molecule. There was no hope of forming the crys-
tals  that  were  needed  to  obtain  the  images  that  we  eventually  ob-
tained.  And  there  was  also  no  technology  at  the  time  for  deriving 
an image. 

Coming to the point that I wished to make in these remarks, the 
reason  for  the  disconnect  between  funding  and  discovery  is  clear, 
and  Senator  Pryor  has  already  commented  upon  it,  and  it  is  that 
discoveries  are,  by  their  nature,  unanticipated,  they’re  completely 
unknown beforehand, they can’t be sought out in a deliberate way, 
they  can’t  be  proposed  to  a  funding  agency  or  evaluated  by  review 
groups. 

So,  how,  then,  are  discoveries  made  in  our  American  system? 
And  the  answer  to  that  question  is:  by  risk-taking.  Scientists  sup-
ported to do straightforward research divert some of their funds for 
testing  new  ideas.  If  they  succeed  the  results  form  the  basis  of  a 
successful  grant  application.  If  they  fail,  they  may  be  in  serious 
trouble,  and  be  unable  to  continue,  even  with  their  original  re-
search. 

Now,  the  risky  nature  of  truly  innovative  research  is  the 
strength,  and  also  the  weakness,  of  our  system.  In  the  past,  when 
NIH funded some 20 to 30 percent of new grant applications, most 
able  people  could  get  a  grant,  and  then  they  would  conceive  of 
ideas that they would try on the side in the manner that I’ve men-
tioned. Occasionally, an important discovery was made, and this is 
the way innovation happened. Today, with funding levels at 10 per-
cent or less, many fine investigators have lost support; few, if any, 
will take risks; and already the pace of discovery is falling dramati-
cally. 

In the March 23, 2007, issue of Science magazine, Senator Arlen 
Specter is quoted as asking the reasonable question, ‘‘What’s going 
to  happen  to  NIH  if  the  budget  is  cut  by  $500  million,’’  a  cut  of 
about 5 percent on the funding for basic research in the biomedical 
sphere?  And  the  answer  is,  of  course,  that  the  amount  of  research 
done,  measured,  for  example,  by  the  number  of  publications,  is 
going  to  fall  by  about  5  percent.  But  innovation  will  be  stifled.  It 
will  be  eliminated  almost  entirely.  The  chilling  effect  of  funding 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:23 Mar 19, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00009 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\79907.TXT JACKIE

6 

cuts ripples through our system. It deters bold action and creativity 
on  the  part  of  established  investigators.  It  discourages  young  sci-
entists even from entering the system. This has already happened. 
My  European  colleagues  told  me,  recently,  they’ve  been  keenly 
aware of a reverse brain-drain that is already underway. 

The  last  point  that  I’d  like  to  make  is  to  reiterate  what  I  have 
just  said,  and  it  relates  to  the  adverse  effects  of  flat  funding  or 
even failing to keep pace with inflation at the NIH, where, in fact, 
a substantial increase is desperately needed. 

The  worst  adverse  effect  is  the  disillusionment  of  young  people. 
The  choice  of  a  career  in  science  represents  an  enormous  sacrifice. 
A  passion  for  science  must  be  weighed  against  a  long  period  of 
training, 10 or more years of postgraduate study at low wages, and 
then  the  possibility  of  no  career  at  all  when  you’re  done.  The  im-
portance of young scientists can’t be overstated. Progress in science 
and  discovery,  in  particular—is  the  work  of  the  best  and  youngest 
minds. America has taken pride in the Nobel Class of 2006 that is 
with  you  here  today.  If  we  don’t  take  action  now  to  restore  enthu-
siasm  among  young  people  for  the  pursuit  of  science,  there  will  be 
no American Class of 2026. 

I thank you. 
[The prepared statement of Dr. Kornberg follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF DR. ROGER KORNBERG, WINZER PROFESSOR IN MEDICINE, 

STANFORD UNIVERSITY 

Chairman  Kerry,  Ranking  Member  Ensign,  and  Members  of  the  Subcommittee,  I 
am  grateful  for  this  opportunity  to  describe  our  research  to  those  who  support  it. 
I  will  give  a  brief  account  of  the  research,  its  significance,  and  future  prospects. 
Then  I  wish  to  explain  some  of  the  challenges  we  face  and  how  they  may  be  over-
come. 
The Control of Gene Expression 

Our  research  has  to  do  with  genes,  which  direct  the  formation  and  the  activities 
of our bodies. Every cell in our bodies contains a complete set of genes. Which sub-
set of genes is used in a particular cell determines whether it becomes nerve, mus-
cle,  blood,  liver  and  so  forth.  The  goal  of  our  research  and  that  of  many  others  has 
been  to  understand  how  this  controlled  use  of  genetic  information  is  accomplished. 
The  practical  implications  are  enormous.  All  infectious  disease  entails  genetic  con-
trol.  Cancer  results  from  a  breakdown  of  control.  Therapeutic  approaches  such  as 
stem cells require intervention in genetic control. 

Genetic information has been likened to a blueprint or a book. In order to use the 
information, the book must be opened and read. Our work has uncovered principles 
of both the opening and the reading of genetic information. We are now close to un-
derstanding genetic control. 
The Nucleosome, Fundamental Particle of the Chromosome 

Genetic  information  is  contained  in  a  long  thin  molecule  of  DNA.  Human  DNA 
is  a  meter  in  length  and  must  be  compressed  to  a  micrometer  in  our  cells.  This 
might  be  accomplished  in  an  organized  way  by  spooling,  as  is  done  for  sewing 
thread  or  garden  hose.  The  problem  is  that  to  gain  access  to  a  gene  in  the  middle, 
the  entire  length  must  be  unspooled.  Nature  has  solved  this  problem  by  the  use  of 
mini-spools. I proposed in 1974, and it has since been verified, that DNA is wrapped 
around  a  set  of  eight  protein  molecules  in  a  particle  known  as  the  nucleosome.  A 
million  of  these  particles  are  strung  together  in  a  human  chromosome.  For  access 
to  a  gene  in  the  middle,  only  a  few  particles  need  be  unspooled,  while  the  rest  are 
left  undisturbed.  Unspooling  is  a  key  control  point  for  gene  activity,  and  is  already 
a promising target of anticancer drugs. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:23 Mar 19, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00010 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\79907.TXT JACKIE

7 

RNA Polymerase, the Gene-Reader in Our Cells 

Once  DNA  is  unspooled,  the  genetic  information  can  be  read.  The  gene  reader  is 
a  protein  machine  known  as  RNA  polymerase,  which  copies  the  genetic  message 
into  a  related  form  called  RNA,  in  a  process  known  as  transcription.  RNA  directs 
the synthesis of proteins, which perform all bodily functions. 

In  work  done  over  the  past  25  years,  we  have  obtained  a  picture  of  RNA  polym-
erase in the act of transcription. RNA polymerase is composed of 30,000 carbon, oxy-
gen,  and  nitrogen  atoms.  Our  picture  shows  the  precise  location  of  every  atom.  In 
this picture, we see the DNA double helix entering the polymerase machine and the 
RNA  product  as  it  is  formed  and  released.  This  picture  has  revealed  the  basis  for 
readout  of  the  genetic  code,  and  how  occasional  mistakes  are  corrected.  It  has  al-
ready been employed for the design of new antibiotic drugs. 

Structure of RNA polymerase in the act of gene transcription. Chains of protein 
building blocks are shown in white and orange. Gene DNA, in the form of a blue 
and  green  double  helix,  enters  from  the  right.  RNA,  shown  in  red  intertwined 
with one DNA strand, exits from the top. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:23 Mar 19, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00011 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\79907.TXT JACKIE

s
p
e

.

2
N
R
O
K
2
0
5

s
p
e
.
1
N
R
O
K
2
0
5

8 

The Future: A Molecular Computer for the Control of Gene Expression 

RNA polymerase does not act alone in the readout of genetic information. An ad-
ditional 50 protein molecules participate directly in transcription. We discovered, in 
particular,  a  giant  assembly  of  20  proteins  called  Mediator  that  serves  as  a  kind 
of  molecular  computer.  Mediator  receives  information  from  inside  the  cell  and  from 
the environment, which it processes and delivers to RNA polymerase. A major objec-
tive for the next decade of our work is to determine the atomic structure of Mediator 
and  to  understand  the  control  of  transcription.  We  already  know  that  mutations  in 
genes encoding Mediator can cause cancer. Knowledge of Mediator structure will en-
able  us  to  correct  many  such  problems  and  to  intervene  more  generally  in  the  con-
trol of gene expression. 
The Challenge of Funding Basic Research 

Our work has been supported almost entirely by the NIH. The cost was about $20 
million  over  30  years,  mostly  for  the  stipends  of  the  more  than  80  graduate  and 
postdoctoral  trainees  involved.  Due  to  current  constraints  on  the  NIH  budget,  vir-
tually none of our work would be funded today. I can say with certainty that a grant 
application  for  the  research  leading  to  the  discovery  of  the  nucleosome,  fundamental 
particle  of  the  chromosome,  would  not  be  approved.  The  reason  is  simple:  I  had  no 
idea at the outset of what I might find, and no good idea of how to go about it. Our 
RNA  polymerase  structure  work  was  supported  by  NIH  only  after  it  became  clear  it 
would succeed. When we began, the prospects for success were virtually nil—no way 
of producing the RNA polymerase, no hope of forming the crystals needed for imag-
ing, and no technology for deriving the image. 

The  reason  for  the  disconnect  between  funding  and  discovery  is  clear:  funds  are 
awarded  for  compelling  ideas,  supported  by  preliminary  evidence,  creating  a  high 
likelihood  of  success.  But  discoveries  are  by  their  nature  unanticipated,  completely 
unknown.  They  cannot  be  sought  out  in  a  deliberate  manner.  They  cannot  be  pro-
posed  to  granting  agencies  or  evaluated  by  review  groups.  So  how  are  discoveries 
made  in  the  American  system?  The  answer  is  by  risk-taking.  Scientists  supported 
to do straightforward research may divert some of their funds for testing new ideas. 
If  they  succeed,  then  the  results  form  the  basis  for  new  grant  applications.  If  they 
fail,  they  may  be  in  trouble  and  be  unable  to  continue  even  with  their  original  re-
search. 

The risky nature of truly innovative research is both the strength and the Achilles 
heel of our system. In the past, when NIH funded approximately 20 percent of new 
grant  applications,  most  capable  investigators  could  obtain  support,  some  of  them 
would  conceive  of  and  try  new  ideas,  and  occasionally  an  important  discovery  was 
made. Today, with funding levels at 10 percent or less, many fine investigators have 
lost  their  support,  few  will  take  risks,  and  the  pace  of  discovery  will  fall  dramati-
cally. 

In the March 23, 2007 issue of Science magazine, Senator Arlen Specter is quoted 
as  asking  the  reasonable  question  ‘‘What’s  going  to  happen  to  NIH  if  the  budget  is 
cut by $500 million?’’ The answer is that the number of publications from NIH-spon-
sored  research  will  decline  accordingly,  by  about  5  percent,  but  innovation  will  be 
stifled  across  the  board.  The  chilling  effect  of  funding  cuts  ripples  through  the  sys-
tem,  deterring  bold  action  and  creativity  on  the  part  of  established  investigators, 
and  discouraging  young  scientists  from  entering  the  system.  This  has  already  hap-
pened.  My  European  colleagues  have  noted  a  reverse  brain  drain  already  occurring 
now. 

There  is  another  way  in  which  small  budget  cuts  can  have  a  disproportionate  ef-
fect.  Research  is  highly  synergistic.  One  part  depends  on  others.  For  example,  my 
own determination of the RNA polymerase structure was critically dependent on the 
work  of  hundreds  of  physicists  and  engineers,  on  synchrotrons  such  as  that  at  the 
Stanford Linear Accelerator and on cutting-edge photon physics. 

Of all the adverse effects of flat-funding or even cutting the NIH budget, the dis-
illusionment  of  young  people  is  the  worst.  The  choice  of  a  career  in  science  already 
represents  a  great  sacrifice.  A  passion  for  science  must  be  weighed  against  a  long 
period  of  training—10  or  more  years  of  postgraduate  study  at  low  wages—and  the 
possibility  of  no  career  at  the  end.  The  importance  of  young  scientists  cannot  be 
overstated.  To  paraphrase  an  illustrious  politician,  it’s  the  people,  stupid!  Progress 
in science, and discovery in particular, is the work of the best young minds. America 
has  taken  pride  in  the  Nobel  class  of  2006,  present  here  today.  If  we  do  not  take 
action  now  to  restore  enthusiasm  for  the  pursuit  of  science,  there  will  be  no  Amer-
ican class of 2026. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:23 Mar 19, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00012 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\79907.TXT JACKIE

Discovery as a Driving Force of Progress 

9 

Much  has  been  said  about  the  value  of  basic  research,  and  I  am  sure  the  argu-
ments  are  well  known  to  you.  I  would  like  to  add  some  points  not  so  often  stated. 
Scientific  medicine  is  comparatively  new,  just  over  a  hundred  years  old.  The  ad-
vances  already  made  have  impacted  the  lives  of  us  all.  Every  major  advance  can 
be  traced  to  a  discovery  made  in  the  pursuit  of  basic  knowledge,  not  for  a  medical 
or economic purpose. Some examples are X-rays, antibiotics, magnetic resonance im-
aging, recombinant DNA, and structure-based drug design. Future advances, includ-
ing the prevention or cure of cancer, AIDS, Alzheimer’s, and other dread afflictions, 
will  come  from  new  discoveries  and  new  information.  Efforts  currently  targeted  to-
ward these and other worthy ends are unlikely to succeed. I recall the words of Lyn-
don  Johnson  to  the  effect  of  ‘‘life-saving  discoveries  locked  up  in  the  laboratory.’’ 
This  serious  sentiment  was  mistaken.  Application  of  existing  knowledge  is  not  the 
limiting factor. The knowledge itself is limiting. 

It  has  been  remarked  that  we  know  1  percent  of  everything  about  the  human 
body.  A  small  fraction  of  a  percent  would  probably  be  more  accurate.  But  consider 
how enormous have been the benefits to our health and our economy from what lit-
tle we know now. Imagine how great would be the benefits of knowing the remain-
ing 99 percent! 

There  is  a  further  overarching  purpose  to  basic  research.  An  urge  to  explore  is 
a  part  of  our  nature.  It  was  a  major  factor  in  the  evolution  of  our  species.  It  has 
motivated us to go to the Moon and to outer space. The exploration of inner, human 
space is no less grand. It is also an expression of the human spirit. 

Senator  PRYOR.  Thank  you.  And,  by  the  way,  all  of  your—the 
text  of  your  statements  will  be  made  part  of  the  record,  so  we’ll— 
you can submit those for the record. 

Next? 

STATEMENT OF ANDREW FIRE, PH.D., PROFESSOR OF 
PATHOLOGY AND GENETICS, STANFORD UNIVERSITY 

SCHOOL OF MEDICINE 

Dr. FIRE. Maybe I should just make a couple of comments about 
the value of today’s hearing. I think one of the things that’s impor-
tant  to  communicate  is  the  enthusiasm  that  we’ve  seen  today  in 
the Senate and the House for science, as an enterprise and science 
as  an  exploration.  That’s  something  that  young  people  and  young 
scientists  in  particular  really  need  to  hear:  the  extent  to  which 
their  work  is  valued  by  the  society  as  a  whole;  if  they’re  thinking 
about a career, the extent to which their ideas are needed by those 
of  us  already  in  science  (particularly  as  some  of  us  are  getting  a 
little bit long in the tooth). I hope today’s hearing will help to send 
these messages. 

[The prepared statement of Dr. Fire follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF ANDREW FIRE, PH.D., PROFESSOR OF PATHOLOGY AND 

GENETICS, STANFORD UNIVERSITY SCHOOL OF MEDICINE 

Senator Inouye, Members of the Committee, ladies and gentlemen. Thank you for 
the  invitation  today  to  speak  on  science  and  its  value  to  our  society.  This  is  a  cer-
tainly  a  worthy  topic  for  discussion  in  such  a  forum  and  I  hope  that  my  comments 
will be helpful in stirring up debate and discussion. 

Before  we  consider  the  value  of  science,  we  should  first  consider  the  goals  of  the 

scientific enterprise in this country. 

Although each individual scientist brings a unique set of goals to their work, cer-

tain themes run throughout the scientific community and elsewhere: 

live a full and complete life without the ravages of tragic disease. 

• Every  American  and  every  citizen  of  the  world  should  have  the  opportunity  to 
• Every  American  and  every  citizen  of  the  world  should  have  access  to  sufficient 
resources and energy to fulfill their potential as individuals and as members of 
society. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:23 Mar 19, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00013 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\79907.TXT JACKIE

10 

• Every  American  and  every  citizen  of  the  world  should  have  the  opportunity  to 
live  in  a  world  where  they  are  safe  from  threats  of  terrorism,  war,  and  other 
violence. 
• Our children, our grandchildren, and generations to come should have opportu-

nities that are comparable to the best that our current society has to offer. 

Scientific  progress  is  by  no  means  the  only  component  in  pursuing  these  goals. 
It  is  nonetheless  a  critical  part.  As  our  world  inevitably  changes,  we  will  need  to 
understand how these changes can affect our lives. As we become capable of greater 
manipulation of our environment, so questions of appropriate behavior, balance and 
sustainability  become  critical.  We  are  at  a  turning  point  where  technology  and 
science  will  underlie  most  of  the  major  decisions  made  by  individuals,  groups,  and 
societies. There is no turning back from this. 

Before  we  can  talk  about  the  value  of  science,  we  need  to  talk  about  limitations. 
• Science can help us to learn how the world works. Science can inform our deci-
sions by allowing us to predict, albeit imperfectly, the concrete consequences of 
proposed action. Science and technology allow us to manipulate the world with-
in us and around us using an ever-expanding array of tools. 
• Science  can’t,  shouldn’t,  and  doesn’t  supplant  our  value  systems.  The  value  we 
place  on  human  life  is  not  a  scientific  calculation.  Likewise,  the  many  issues 
we  debate  as  a  society:  our  allocation  of  resources  between  the  young  and  the 
old,  our  definitions  of  the  beginning  and  end  of  life,  our  ways  to  prioritize  the 
individual  and  the  society,  our  allocation  of  effort  toward  long  term  mainte-
nance of the human race; all of these rely on fundamental value systems outside 
of and beyond the scientific enterprise. Although scientific data (from molecular 
biology to theoretical physics to economics) can in some case inform ongoing de-
bates  as  to  the  material  consequences  of  each  choice,  the  eventual  decisions 
must come from our values and value systems. 

Before we can talk about the value of science, we need to talk about opportunities. 
From a portfolio too large to summarize, here are a few. 
• A dedicated war on cancer has been a flagship of the American scientific enter-
prise  for  the  last  36  years.  Inroads  toward  improving  treatment  of  many  types 
of cancer have been made in this interval, often based on a pipeline model that 
starts  from  investigation  of  fundamental  biology  and  continues  through  careful 
clinical  trials.  The  pipeline  is  by  no  means  swift,  but  the  initial  results  have 
made  a  difference  between  life  and  death,  and  between  hope  and  despair,  for 
millions  on  young  and  old  people.  Despite  these  advances,  cancer  still  takes  a 
devastating  toll  on  individuals  and  families  alike.  We  know  that  we  can  do 
more. 
• Infectious  disease  was  declared  to  be  a  ‘‘closed  book’’  in  the  1960s,  leading  to 
a shift away from the commitment of this country to our public health agencies. 
This  turned  out  to  be  tragically  misguided.  We  now  understand  that  new 
epidemics  of  infectious  diseases  are  an  intrinsic  aspect  of  the  dynamically  con-
nected  society  we  live  in:  Flu,  AIDS,  SARS,  Tuberculosis,  Malaria  and  many 
more that we can only speculate on. Our capabilities for rapidly identifying and 
tracking infectious disease have never been better. Still, I am scared for the fu-
ture. We know that we can do more. 
• Clean,  safe,  and  renewable,  energy  production  may  become  the  most  pressing 
economic,  scientific,  technical,  and  political  challenges  of  the  21st  century. 
Science  has  provided  an  armful  of  possible  contributions  in  the  form  of  new 
sources  and  dramatically  improved  efficiencies.  Despite  the  recent  burgeoning 
of  a  new  energy  industry,  an  upcoming  global  crisis  in  energy  availability  and 
in  the  consequences  of  our  current  use  patterns  seem  virtually  certain.  We 
know that we can do more. 

Before  we  can  talk  about  the  value  of  science,  we  need  to  talk  about  some  of  the 

challenges. 

• We do not train enough scientists, engineers, or doctors. We do not train enough 
teachers.  To  maintain  a  technologically  driven  society  and  to  meet  the  chal-
lenges ahead, we need to vastly increase the number of technically trained indi-
viduals  ready  to  work  in  all  areas.  Our  needs  in  the  area  of  science  education 
are  evident  at  all  levels:  in  elementary,  middle,  and  high  schools,  in  college, 
graduate,  and  professional  schools,  in  continued  training  of  our  scientific  work-
force,  and  in  the  sophisticated  scientific  training  that  the  general  public  will 
need  to  make  rational  decisions.  In  none  of  these  areas  are  we  completely  lost. 
Education  in  this  country  has  a  remarkable  history.  Many  of  our  institutions 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:23 Mar 19, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00014 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\79907.TXT JACKIE

11 

are  unparalleled  in  their  quality  anywhere  in  the  world.  At  the  same  time, 
many of our young people never get the chance to make contributions that could 
uniquely  benefit  the  society  because  their  communities  lack  the  needed  edu-
cational opportunities. This is not an area that we can afford to ignore. Invest-
ment in education is an investment in our future. A neglect of this opportunity 
at any level would be a colossal mistake. 
• The  critical  early  discovery  stages  of  the  developmental  ‘‘pipeline’’  for  science 
and technology often take place, by nature and by necessity, in universities and 
non-profit  research  centers.  Research  of  value  in  such  open  environments  has 
only  been  possible  with  public  support  of  Federal  agencies.  This  research  has 
driven both innovation and discovery in American science to an extent that the 
scientific  enterprise  in  the  U.S.  is  truly  and  uniquely  a  societal  effort.  In  this 
realm  we  face  a  continuous  challenge  in  maintaining  a  productive  and  creative 
scientific  enterprise  under  the  inevitably  fluctuating  conditions  of  public  sup-
port.  Science  in  the  U.S.  has  thrived  on  a  competitive  granting  system,  a  sink- 
or-swim arrangement that does a remarkable job in funding the most important 
and highest quality research while driving the establishment as a whole toward 
excellence.  But  how  do  we  handle  the  inevitable  instability  in  supply  and  de-
mand, in the cost of research, in the size of the academic workforce, and in poli-
cies  and  outlook  of  the  institutions  of  higher  learning  that  are  partners  with 
the  government  in  making  this  work?  In  times  of  expansion,  there  is  ample 
room in the system for all types of ideas, all points within the pipeline, and all 
levels  of  venture-risk.  In  times  of  contraction,  we  all  fear  that  the  next  grant 
review  might  end  our  research  careers.  Clearly,  the  solution  here  cannot  be  an 
infinite  and  exponential  growth  of  the  public  research  enterprise.  Private  sup-
port for science can smooth out some of the rough spots, but as a small fraction 
of  the  total  there  is  simply  not  enough  private  support  for  more  than  a  token 
level  of  stabilization.  To  allow  some  stability,  interactions  between  research  in-
stitutions  and  Federal  funding  agencies  are  crucial:  many  grantee  institutions 
are  finding  that  their  role  must  now  include  a  clear  commitment  to  bridging 
support for their faculty, employees, and for ongoing scientific projects, even as 
they  recognize  that  moving  forward  will  only  happen  with  Federal  support. 
More  institutions  will  realize  this  over  the  next  few  years.  At  the  same  time, 
the great value of continuity in our public investment in science and technology 
needs to be communicated. We are at a crossroads in this area in the biomedical 
community with many critical research programs that may not survive the next 
few years, many creative senior investigators shutting their labs, and many po-
tentially brilliant young investigators afraid to choose careers in a field this un-
stable. 
• Discovery-based  investigations  in  academia  make  up  just  one  segment  of  the 
larger  scientific  enterprise.  Even  the  most  important  of  basic  discoveries  make 
their  impact  through  a  development  process  that  involves  extensive  further  re-
search  in  academic  settings  combined  with  research  and  development  in  the 
commercial  sector.  Translation  of  basic  discoveries  toward  beneficial  results  re-
lies  on  additional  groups  of  dedicated  and  highly  trained  scientists,  physicians, 
engineers,  and  others.  Fulfillment  of  the  potential  from  academic  discoveries 
also  requires  massive  investment  in  the  commercial  sector,  considerable  risk- 
taking,  and  a  real  chance  that  any  given  project  will  fail.  In  the  biomedical 
area, we simply do not know enough about the individual human body or about 
the  diversity  in  our  species  to  predict  the  outcome  for  a  proposed  new  treat-
ment. Clinical trials must be done, they must be done carefully and safely, they 
are extremely costly, and a fraction give a disappointing result. Given the costs 
of  clinical  trials,  the  vast  majority  must  be  carried  out  in  the  private  sector. 
When  there  is  success,  we  have  great  advances  in  medicine.  Although  we  also 
learn from the failures, this is rarely a consolation to the affected shareholders. 
For  commercial  translation  of  scientific  discovery  to  continue  there  needs  to  be 
a  reasonable  expectation  of  possible  return  on  investment.  Much  of  this  relies 
on  the  U.S.  Patent  system,  itself  a  gigantic  and  often  cumbersome  endeavor 
that  like  so  many  of  our  institutions  is  both  imperfect  and  the  best  we  have. 
The  patent  system  doesn’t  operate  in  an  economic  vacuum.  For  commercializa-
tion  to  benefit  society  there  also  needs  to  be  a  mechanism  where  technologies 
are available at prices that allow accessibility by all Americans who are in need. 
One  of  the  lessons  we  may  hope  to  learn  over  the  next  few  years  is  how  best 
to incentivize the risk-taking that is essential in commercial technology develop-
ment while providing new technologies affordably to all who are in need. 
• As basic and applied scientists in education, academics, government, and indus-
try we can make the greatest positive impact by supporting each others endeav-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:23 Mar 19, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00015 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\79907.TXT JACKIE

ors, training each other in the areas that we know best, and by listening to each 
other to understand the needs and potential of fields that are unfamiliar. 

12 

Before  we  can  talk  about  the  value  of  science,  we  need  perhaps  most  urgently  to 

talk about our own responsibilities as scientists. 

provements for all Americans and for all people everywhere. 

into the larger scientific community both in the U.S. and worldwide. 

• It  is  our  responsibility  to  continue  a  scientific  enterprise  directed  toward  im-
• It  is  our  responsibility  to  seek  out  and  pursue  areas  of  inquiry  where  scientific 
progress  could  benefit  humanity,  whether  it  benefits  a  few  individuals,  a  few 
communities, countries, continents, or the entire human race. 
• It  is  our  responsibility  at  each  stage  of  scientific  inquiry  to  integrate  our  work 
• It  is  our  responsibility  to  carry  out  our  research  in  an  ethical,  truthful,  and 
open  manner  and  to  follow  the  rules  and  restrictions  set  down  by  our  govern-
ments and our conscience. 
• It  is  our  responsibility  to  maintain  a  pride  in  the  creativity  and  uniqueness  of 
our own thought and research, while acknowledging and fostering the ideas and 
contributions of others. 
• It  is  our  responsibility  as  scientists  to  be  leaders  in  teaching  science  at  all  lev-
• It  is  our  responsibility  to  communicate  the  scope  of  scientific  opportunities  and 
the  spectrum  of  progress  to  our  leadership,  to  the  public,  and  to  our  neighbors 
around  the  world.  At  the  same  time,  it  is  an  equal  responsibility  to  commu-
nicate the limitations of our work, the challenges that we face in improving the 
human  condition  and  the  risks  that  come  from  increased  ability  to  manipulate 
our bodies and our environment. 
• The  21st  century  will  bring  new  challenges,  new  opportunities,  new  risks,  new 
technologies,  and  new  understanding.  It  is  our  responsibility  as  scientists  to 
make these work to the benefit of our society and of all humankind. 

els. 

We will do our best. 
Thank you Mr. Chairman. 

Senator PRYOR. Thank you. 
Dr. Mello? 

INSTITUTE 

STATEMENT  OF  CRAIG  C.  MELLO,  PH.D.,  HOWARD  HUGHES 
MEDICAL 
INVESTIGATOR  AND  THE  BLAIS 
UNIVERSITY  CHAIR  IN  MOLECULAR  MEDICINE,  UNIVERSITY 
OF MASSACHUSETTS MEDICAL SCHOOL 
Dr.  MELLO.  Thank  you.  Senator,  it’s  an  honor  to  be  here.  And  I 

would like to just make a few brief comments. 

I  think  we  live  in,  you  know,  uncertain  times,  and  we  have,  on 
the other hand, great opportunities. And those are the two reasons 
why  we  need  to  continue  to  invest  in  science  broadly  in  this  coun-
try. 

Why do you make investments? Well, you invest for uncertain fu-
tures,  for  possible,  you  know,  hard  times  ahead.  You  also  invest 
when  you  see  an  opportunity  and  you  don’t  want  to  miss  it.  You 
realize that there’s a—some great new discovery that’s been made, 
and  now  it’s  time  to  capitalize  on  that.  That’s  the  time  we  live  in 
right now. We have both of those things going on. 

We  are  capable  now  of  tremendous  advances  in  medicine.  We 
have  the  blueprint  for  the  human.  We  understand  now  the—every 
single gene that makes a human. And we have technology and ap-
proaches  like  RNA  interference  that  allow  us  to  inactivate  those 
genes and examine the consequences and study outcomes, and even 
to intervene in diseases at the very basic level of—the genetic level 
of disease. This is exciting and breathtaking opportunity. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:23 Mar 19, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00016 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\79907.TXT JACKIE

13 

And  so,  just  at  the—just  at  the  moment  when  we  have  this  op-
portunity,  what  are  we  seeing?  We’ve  invested  in  the  genome  se-
quence.  That  genome  sequence  is  up  on  the  computers  in  China 
and  every  other  country.  What  are  we  doing?  Well,  we’re  not  in-
vesting—we’re not investing in that opportunity. 

So,  I  think,  in  the  life  sciences  and  medicine  we  really  have  to 
take  another  look  at  what  we’re  doing,  because  these  are  the 
sources  that  will  generate  wealth  and  generate  new  innovative 
companies,  the  basis—for  example,  RNAi  is  already  a  multibillion- 
dollar  industry  in  this  country.  These  are  opportunities  that  are 
being  lost  at  this  moment.  So,  I  hope  that  we  can  bring  that  out 
further in further discussion. 

Thank you. 
[The prepared statement of Dr. Mello follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF CRAIG C.  MELLO,  PH.D.,  HOWARD HUGHES MEDICAL 
INSTITUTE INVESTIGATOR AND THE BLAIS UNIVERSITY CHAIR IN MOLECULAR 
MEDICINE, UNIVERSITY OF MASSACHUSETTS MEDICAL SCHOOL 
Good  afternoon.  Mr.  Chairman  and  Members  of  the  Committee,  it  is  a  privilege 

to have the opportunity to testify before you this afternoon. 

In a small lab at the University of Massachusetts Medical School and a small lab 
at  the  Carnegie  Institution  of  Washington,  with  support  from  the  NIH  and  other 
private  sources,  Andy  Fire  and  I  made  a  series  of  observations  that  have  sparked 
a  revolution  in  our  understanding  of  how  the  genetic  information  that  makes  us 
human  is  stored  and  expressed  inside  our  cells.  Today,  as  we  speak,  thousands  of 
scientists in labs all over the world are building on these discoveries to understand 
and  to  develop  treatments  for  human  disease,  to  shed  further  light  on  the  basic 
functioning  of  cells,  and  to  study  and  modify  plants,  animals  and  microbes  impor-
tant  in  agriculture,  biofuels  and  other  applications  essential  to  meeting  the  many 
needs of our civilization. 

Mr. Chairman, members of the Committee, we as a nation, indeed we humans as 
a species, are dangerously out of equilibrium with our environment. Pressures from 
over-population  and  lack  of  quality  medical  care  in  third-world  countries  (and  even 
here  in  the  U.S.)  are  leading  to  millions  of  unnecessary  deaths  each  year,  deaths 
from  diseases  we  know  how  to  treat,  and  these  medically-underserved  populations 
are  incubating  new,  potentially  devastating  pathogens.  Alternative  fuels  and  better 
crops must be developed to support populations that have already reached sizes that 
challenge  the  very  productive  capacity  of  the  planet.  In  short,  we  need  a  call  to 
arms, a call to fund science broadly in this country so that our Nation can face these 
challenges and can continue to lead the world toward a brighter future. 

The  discovery  of  gene  silencing  by  double-stranded  RNA—‘‘RNA  interference,’’  or 
‘‘RNAi,’’  for  which  Andy  and  I  were  awarded  the  2006  Nobel  Prize  in  Physiology  or 
Medicine—was not something that anyone was looking for. We knew, based on some 
early  and  unexpected  laboratory  observations,  that  there  was  something  puzzling 
going  on,  and  we  grew  more  excited  over  time  by  what  we  were  seeing  as  we  tried 
to understand. RNA interference went from being a puzzle, to being understood well 
enough for us to publish a paper in the prestigious journal Nature in 1998, to being 
applied  as  a  tool  for  treating  human  disease,  to  being  recognized  with  the  Nobel 
Prize,  in  just  8  years.  The  research  and  the  discovery  were  all  the  more  exciting 
to us because it was all so unexpected. 

This could happen only because we are in an era unprecedented for the potential 
for  scientific  discovery.  The  investments  in  science  made  in  the  late  1990s  and  the 
first  years  of  this  century  opened  vast  opportunities  for  science  and  scientists:  uni-
versities built research labs and trained and hired new young scientists—like myself 
and  Andy—who  in  turn  made  new  contributions  that  other  scientists  learned  from 
and  expanded  upon.  The  investments  in  facilities  and  training  and  the  tools  of  re-
search  were  the  investments  that  led  to  the  sequencing  of  the  human  genome—the 
mandatory first step in realizing the dream of interfering with disease at the genetic 
level. RNAi has tremendous promise for building on the work of the Human Genome 
Project, but only if further research is funded and allowed to continue. Importantly, 
information, the universal currency of science, now flows effortlessly and almost in-
stantly  around  the  globe.  Consequently,  the  pace  of  discovery  is  picking  up  world-
wide,  increasing  the  opportunities  for  discovery  but  also  increasing  the  competition 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:23 Mar 19, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00017 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\79907.TXT JACKIE

14 

for  U.S.  laboratories.  If  we  do  not  increase  the  U.S.  investment  to  keep  pace  with 
these  opportunities,  then  we  will  see  future  multibillion  dollar  technologies  like 
RNAi discovered and developed abroad. If we don’t act now to increase science fund-
ing,  other  countries  will  capitalize  on  the  investments  we,  the  American  people, 
have made in funding science over the past decades. 

At  the  University  of  Massachusetts,  we  have  established  an  RNAi  Therapeutics 
Center to further capitalize on this momentum and our own particular expertise in 
the field of RNAi-based gene silencing. The vision for this Center emphasizes facili-
tating  and  promoting  clinical  and  translational  research  and  ultimately  developing 
the  next  generation  of  powerful  drugs  to  treat  a  broad  range  of  diseases  including 
cancers, Alzheimer’s, diabetes, heart disease, and many other areas in which my re-
nowned UMass colleagues have already dedicated years of work. 

At UMass, there is a strong belief that science, and research, do truly matter, for 
a much larger reason than prizes or prestige: science matters because no one knows 
from where, or how, or based on what unpredictable series of events, the next break-
through  might  come,  and  there  has  never  been  a  moment  in  human  history  with 
more  opportunity  or  greater  need  for  advances  in  the  life  sciences  than  right  now. 
This  isn’t  science  for  the  sake  of  science,  but  science  for  the  sake  of  medical  ad-
vances and lives to be saved. 

This  is  just  the  beginning!  The  confluence  of  the  energetic  students  and  innova-
tive  young  scientists  trained  in  the  last  two  decades,  with  the  investment  in  facili-
ties  and  resources,  combined  with  the  discoveries  of  the  past  few  years,  all  flow  to-
gether  to  create  a  perfect  moment  of  opportunity.  But  just  at  the  time  when  we 
should  be  investing  in  science  at  an  unprecedented  level,  we  are  not.  Just  at  the 
moment  when  we  should  be  capitalizing  on  the  investments  of  the  past  decade, 
funding  for  basic  research  is  in  decline.  If  Andy  and  I  had  been  faced  with  today’s 
funding  climate  10  years  ago  when  we  applied  for  support  for  the  work  that  led  to 
the  discovery  of  RNAi,  I  don’t  think  we  would  have  received  that  support.  What 
other discoveries—what work like RNAi, what research that will advance it in ways 
we  can’t  even  imagine—will  be  missed,  because  we  stepped  back  from  the  oppor-
tunity? 

Thank you. I will be happy to take your questions. 

Senator PRYOR. Dr. Mather? 
STATEMENT OF DR. JOHN C. MATHER, CHIEF SCIENTIST, 

SCIENCE MISSION DIRECTORATE, NASA 

Dr. MATHER. Yes, hi. Thanks for having us all come to talk with 

you. We hope we can answer your questions. 

I’ll  just  say  a  few  things  about  what  I’ve  seen  in  my  life  that 

seem important to the future of the Nation. 

Now, one is the astonishing opportunities that we now have. As-
tronomy has brought forward the possibility of knowing the history 
of  the  universe  from  the  beginning  until  the  formation  of  planets 
like  ours.  So,  this  huge  enterprise  now  enables  us  to  tell  our  own 
story and discover our history. And I think it’s a very exciting thing 
for  students  to  see  this  as  the  amazing  intellectual  challenge  that 
we  now  have.  And  it’s  deeply  important  to  people’s  sense  of  who 
they  are,  to  know  how  we  got  here.  And  there  are  so  many  things 
to know about it from astronomy before we hand it over to the life 
sciences to say, ‘‘Well, what else can you tell us about that?’’ 

So,  it’s  exciting  for  students.  It’s  a  wonderful  way  to  reach  out 
to  the  public  to  get  youngsters  excited  about  science.  And  it  was 
important  to  me,  it  still  is  important  to  me.  I’m  doing  what  I  can. 
So,  there’s  the  pull  of  people  into  science  and  technology,  to  show 
them the excitement. 

There’s  another  thing  that  we  do  to  try  to  get  people  in,  and 
that’s to make sure they get good education opportunities and their 
requirements  and  tests.  And  I  think  that’s  a  little  harder  to  man-
age,  because  I  think  threats  of  punishment  are  less  effective  than 
enchantment and excitement about science. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:23 Mar 19, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00018 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\79907.TXT JACKIE

15 

But,  third,  I  think  there’s  a  huge  opportunity  that  we  now  have 
to  tell  our  young  workforce  what’s  going  to  happen.  You  know,  if 
they  see  that  funding  is  steady  or  going  up  with  inflation,  then 
they  say,  ‘‘Aha,  there’s  a  career  for  me  in  science,  if  I  want  to  do 
that.’’ And so, it’s very important whether we’ve got our foot on the 
accelerator  or  our  foot  on  the  brake,  because  it  affects  the  whole 
future of our workforce. 

So,  kids  are  smart,  they  can  tell  whether  science  is  going  to  be 
a great career for them or not. And so, you’ve heard specific exam-
ples about biologists who have to spend many years being postdocs, 
and  then  they  don’t  know  if  they’ll  ever  get  a  job.  I  think  it  starts 
long  before  that.  Kids  in  grade  school  and  high  school  can  sense 
whether there’s a life for them in the technical careers that we find 
so important for our country. 

So, thanks. 
[The prepared statement of Dr. Mather follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF DR. JOHN C. MATHER, CHIEF SCIENTIST, 

SCIENCE MISSION DIRECTORATE, NASA 

Mr.  Chairman  and  Members  of  the  Subcommittee,  thank  you  for  the  opportunity 
to  appear  today  along  with  the  other  recipients  of  scientific  Nobel  Prizes,  all  rep-
resenting  the  tremendous  scientific  achievements  that  the  United  States  can  make 
to  the  benefit  of  the  world.  I  currently  serve  as  the  Chief  Scientist  for  the  Science 
Mission  Directorate  at  NASA  Headquarters,  and  am  also  the  Senior  Project  Sci-
entist for the James Webb Space Telescope at NASA’s Goddard Space Flight Center. 
My Inspirations 

I  am  very  proud  of  the  support  that  our  great  Nation  has  given  to  science  over 
the  years,  from  both  private  and  public  sources.  Benjamin  Franklin  was  one  of  the 
great  scientists  of  his  time,  and  he  put  his  personal  credibility  on  the  line  to  per-
suade the King of France to support the colonists in their fight for freedom. Thomas 
Jefferson  sent  off  the  Nation’s  first  scientific  expedition  to  explore  the  route  to  the 
Pacific Ocean. Industrial tycoons and taxpayer support in the 19th and 20th century 
built  libraries  and  museums  and  the  world’s  greatest  ground-based  telescopes,  es-
tablishing  U.S.  leadership  in  education  for  the  people  and  in  astronomy  in  par-
ticular. When I was eight years old, I visited the American Museum of Natural His-
tory and the Hayden Planetarium in New York, and I was amazed to imagine that 
scientists  could  now  hope  to  find  out  how  the  universe  began,  how  volcanoes  and 
earthquakes  work,  and  how  life  might  have  come  to  be  possible  here  on  Earth. 
When the Sputnik was launched, the Nation saw once again that science was essen-
tial  to  our  security,  and  suddenly  public  schools  had  science  fairs,  high  school  stu-
dents  went  off  to  National  Science  Foundation-supported  college  courses  over  the 
summer,  and  NASA  was  formed  to  respond  to  the  new  challenge.  Only  a  few  years 
later,  President  Kennedy  launched  the  Apollo  program  to  show  that  the  U.S.  as  a 
free  nation  was  also  a  leader  of  science  and  technology.  And  James  Webb,  NASA’s 
second Administrator, persuaded President Kennedy that the Apollo program should 
include  serious  scientific  work  for  the  good  of  the  U.S.,  and  was  not  just  a  foreign 
policy statement. 

I was a young graduate student at the University of California in Berkeley when 
our  astronauts  reached  the  Moon,  and  soon  after  that  I  was  working  on  measuring 
the  cosmic  microwave  background  radiation  for  my  thesis  research.  This  is  the  re-
sidual  heat  radiation  of  the  great  Big  Bang  that  happened  13.7  billion  years  ago. 
I was supported in this work by several Federal agencies, and by a private scholar-
ship  from  the  Fannie  and  John  Hertz  Foundation.  Only  6  months  after  completing 
my  Ph.D.  in  1974,  I  was  organizing  a  proposal  for  submission  to  NASA  to  measure 
this  radiation  much  better.  As  it  turned  out  it  was  an  excellent  idea,  and  turned 
into  a  successful  satellite  mission  called  the  Cosmic  Background  Explorer.  Fifteen 
years  later,  in  1989,  it  was  launched,  and  we  immediately  found  very  strong  evi-
dence  confirming  the  Big  Bang  theory.  And  just  17  years  after  that,  our  work  won 
the  Nobel  Prize  in  Physics  for  2006.  I  believe  that  this  prize  recognizes  the  unique 
capability  that  the  U.S.  possesses,  to  put  scientists  and  engineers  together  to  build 
new  tools  that  have  never  existed  before,  to  discover  what  has  never  been  known 
before. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:23 Mar 19, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00019 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\79907.TXT JACKIE

16 

NASA’s  Role 

in  Promoting  Science,  Technology,  Engineering,  and 

Mathematics 

As  a  nation,  we  must  encourage  our  students  to  pursue  opportunities  in  science, 
technology, engineering, and mathematics (STEM). NASA is in a unique position to 
offer  groundbreaking  opportunities  in  these  areas  to  engage  students  and  provide 
long-term  career  paths.  The  President’s  Vision  for  Space  Exploration  calls  upon 
NASA  to  conduct  robotic  and  human  exploration  of  the  Moon,  Mars  and  other  des-
tinations, to conduct robotic exploration across the solar system, and to conduct ad-
vanced  telescope  searches  for  Earth-like  planets  around  other  stars.  Other  Presi-
dential directives and legislative mandates instruct NASA to conduct Earth observa-
tion  and  scientific  research  and  to  explore  the  origin  and  destiny  of  the  universe. 
As  a  critical  component  of  achieving  NASA’s  mission,  the  Agency’s  education  ac-
tivities  reflect  a  balanced  and  diverse  portfolio  of  Elementary  and  Secondary  Edu-
cation, Higher Education, e-Education, Informal Education, and Minority University 
Research  and  Education.  Through  its  unique  mission,  workforce,  and  facilities, 
NASA is leading the way to inspire interest in STEM careers, as few other organiza-
tions  can.  Our  efforts  have  also  made  significant  impacts  in  engaging  underserved 
and underrepresented communities in STEM. 

Accordingly, we are preparing the pathway for the next generation with great an-
ticipation.  These  ‘‘explorers  and  innovators  of  the  new  millennium’’  must  fully  rep-
resent our Nation’s vibrant and rich diversity. Furthermore, we will support our Na-
tion’s  universities,  colleges  and  community  colleges  by  providing  exciting  research 
and  internship  opportunities  that  ‘‘light  the  fire’’  and  ‘‘fuel  the  passion’’  for  a  new 
culture of learning and achievement in STEM. 

NASA’s  educational  activities  are  designed  to  inspire,  engage,  educate,  and  em-
ploy  our  Nation’s  talented  youth.  As  contributors  to  achieving  the  Nation’s  goals, 
NASA  is  committed  to  three  primary  objectives  to  help  improve  the  state  of  STEM 
education in our country: 

1. Strengthen NASA and the Nation’s future workforce—NASA will identify and 
develop  the  critical  skills  and  capabilities  needed  to  ensure  achievement  of  the 
Vision for Space Exploration, science, and aeronautics. 
2. Attract and retain students in STEM disciplines through a progression of edu-
cational  opportunities  for  students,  teachers,  and  faculty—NASA  will  focus  on 
engaging  and  retaining  students  in  STEM  education  programs  to  encourage 
their  pursuit  of  educational  disciplines  critical  to  NASA’s  future  engineering, 
scientific, and technical missions. 
3.  Engage  Americans  in  NASA’s  mission—NASA  will  build  strategic  partner-
ships  and  linkages  between  STEM  formal  and  informal  education  providers. 
Through  hands-on,  interactive,  educational  activities,  NASA  will  engage  stu-
dents,  educators,  families,  and  the  general  public  to  increase  America’s  science 
and technology literacy. 

Within  NASA  science,  a  broad  spectrum  of  education  activities  are  sponsored, 
ranging  from  kindergarten  to  postgraduate  levels.  All  NASA’s  science  missions  and 
programs  must  have  an  education  and  public  outreach  component.  Through  a  com-
petitive,  peer-review  selection  process,  NASA  provides  funding  dedicated  to  edu-
cation  and  public  outreach  to  researchers.  NASA  also  sponsors  graduate  and  post- 
doctoral  fellowship  opportunities.  In  addition,  the  Agency  is  looking  for  new  ways 
to provide increased opportunities for students to gain greater experience developing 
and launching their own science instruments, either in conjunction with science mis-
sions or through its suborbital rocket and balloon programs. 

NASA  is  truly  a  premier  Agency  in  its  ability  to  reach  out  and  inspire  students. 
This is exemplified in part by the fact that NASA alone was responsible for 11 per-
cent of Science News magazine’s top stories—covering all fields of science—for 2006; 
this  is  an  all-time  record  in  the  34  years  that  this  metric  has  been  tracked.  Impor-
tant findings resulting from NASA’s science programs ranged from new observations 
of familiar phenomena like the ozone hole, hurricanes, and rainfall, to the discovery 
of lakes of organic hydrocarbons on Saturn’s planet-sized moon Titan, to the identi-
fication  of  new  classes  of  planetary  abodes  across  our  galaxy,  to  the  study  of  the 
Sun’s  magnetic  field,  showing  it  to  be  more  turbulent  and  dynamic  than  previously 
expected. 

In  October  2006,  NASA’s  twin  STEREO  spacecraft  were  launched  to  help  re-
searchers  construct  the  first-ever  three-dimensional  views  of  the  Sun’s  atmosphere. 
This  new  view  will  improve  our  abilities  in  space  weather  forecasting  and  greatly 
advance the ability of scientists to understand solar physics, which, in turn, enables 
us to better protect humans living and working in space. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:23 Mar 19, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00020 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\79907.TXT JACKIE

17 

From  across  the  solar  system,  NASA’s  spacecraft  have  provided  startling  new  in-
sights into the formation and evolution of the planets. Images from the Mars Global 
Surveyor  have  revealed  recent  deposits  in  gullies  on  Mars,  evidence  that  suggests 
water  may  have  flowed  in  these  locations  within  the  last  several  years.  The  Mars 
Reconnaissance  Orbiter,  which  began  its  primary  science  phase  in  November  2006, 
has  not  only  taken  extraordinary  high  resolution  images  of  Mars  at  resolutions 
greater  than  any  other  mission  to-date,  but  has  taken  incredible  images  of  Oppor-
tunity and Spirit on the surface, and helped the Phoenix lander find a safe landing 
area.  From  its  orbit  around  Saturn,  the  Cassini  spacecraft  recently  found  unex-
pected evidence of liquid water geysers erupting from near-surface water reservoirs 
on Saturn’s moon Enceladus. 

Additionally,  the  Wilkinson  Microwave  Anisotropy  Probe  (WMAP)  Explorer  mis-
sion, which I helped to propose, was able to gather new information about the first 
second  after  the  universe  formed,  while  the  Chandra  X-ray  Observatory  provided 
new and strong evidence of dark matter, and the Hubble Space Telescope identified 
16 candidate planets orbiting other stars near the center of our galaxy. 

Using instruments flying closer to Earth, NASA investigators flew 29 separate sci-
entific  instruments  to  60,000  foot  altitudes  aboard  NASA’s  WB–57F  Canberra  air-
craft  in  the  Costa  Rica  Aura  Validation  Experiment  (CAVE).  These  airborne  meas-
urements, coupled with measurements from the orbiting Aura spacecraft, shed light 
on  how  ozone-destroying  chemicals  get  into  the  stratosphere  over  the  tropics  and 
how  high-altitude  clouds  affect  the  flow  of  water  vapor—a  powerful  greenhouse 
gas—in  this  critical  region  of  the  atmosphere.  This  is  fundamental  basic  work  on 
the physical and chemical processes of the atmosphere. 

Examples  of  important  successes  in  our  data  analysis  programs  are  also  diverse. 
Astronomers  combining  data  from  the  Hubble  Space  Telescope  with  data  from 
ground-based  and  other  space-based  telescopes  have  created  the  first  three-dimen-
sional map of the large-scale distribution of dark matter in the universe. NASA re-
searchers  also  found  organic  materials  that  formed  in  the  most  distant  regions  of 
the  early  solar  system  preserved  in  a  unique  meteorite  that  fell  over  Canada  in 
2000. And, using a network of small automated telescopes, astronomers have discov-
ered  a  planet  orbiting  in  a  binary  star  system,  showing  that  planet  formation  very 
likely  occurs  in  most  star  systems.  In  our  home  solar  system,  scientists  predicted 
that  the  next  solar  activity  cycle  will  be  30–50  percent  stronger  than  the  previous 
one  and  up  to  a  year  late.  Accurately  predicting  the  sun’s  cycles  will  help  plan  for 
the  effects  of  solar  storms  and  help  protect  future  astronauts.  And  a  breakthrough 
‘‘solar  climate’’  forecast  was  made  with  a  combination  of  computer  simulation  and 
groundbreaking  observations  of  the  solar  interior  from  space  using  the  NASA/ESA 
Solar and Heliospheric Observatory (SOHO). 

As  these  and  other  results  about  our  world  and  the  universe  pour  in,  NASA  also 
continues  to  develop  and  launch  our  next  generation  of  missions,  and  to  support  a 
vigorous  scientific  community  via  research  and  data  analysis  funding.  In  total, 
NASA  currently  is  developing  or  flying  a  total  of  93  space  and  Earth  Science  mis-
sions—far  more  than  all  of  the  other  space  agencies  of  the  world  combined.  The 
Agency  also  supports  over  3,000  separate  research  investigations  in  its  science  Re-
search and Analysis programs, spending a total of approximately $600 million annu-
ally  on  scientific  data  analysis,  modeling,  and  theory  across  the  four  disciplines  of 
Earth  and  space  science.  Undergraduate  and  graduate  students  are  active  partici-
pants in these efforts. 
Conclusion 

We  must  encourage  every  segment  of  our  population—girls  and  boys  alike—from 
every walk of life, of every color and creed, to reach out and prepare for the opportu-
nities  of  the  21st  century.  Building  a  pipeline  of  science  and  engineering  talent  to 
serve  in  the  coming  decades  as  we  implement  the  Vision  for  Space  Exploration  to 
continue  America’s  pre-eminence  in  space  and  aeronautics  research  and  develop-
ment  can  and  must  be  done.  NASA’s  mission  is  one  of  dreams,  vision  and  explo-
ration—characteristics  that  are  ingrained  in  the  American  spirit  and  the  underpin-
ning  of  innovation  and  economic  competitiveness.  We  intend  to  continue  turning 
heads  across  the  world  by  developing  space  missions  and  supporting  scientific  re-
search  that  rewrites  textbooks  in  all  of  our  science  disciplines,  thus  inspiring  the 
next generation of students. 

Again,  thank  you  for  the  opportunity  to  testify  today.  I  would  be  pleased  to  re-
spond  to  any  questions  you  or  the  other  Members  of  the  Subcommittee  may  have. 

Senator PRYOR. Thank you. 
Dr. Smoot? 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:23 Mar 19, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00021 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\79907.TXT JACKIE

18 

STATEMENT OF GEORGE SMOOT, PH.D., SENIOR SCIENTIST, 

LAWRENCE BERKELEY NATIONAL LABORATORY, PROFESSOR 

OF PHYSICS, UNIVERSITY OF CALIFORNIA, BERKELEY 

Dr.  SMOOT.  Senator  Pryor,  Senator  Stevens,  distinguished  mem-
bers  of  the  Committee,  including  my  home-state  Senator  Barbara 
Boxer, thank you for holding these important hearings and for rec-
ognizing  the  importance  of  a  vigorous  scientific  enterprise  for 
America’s  health  and  vitality.  I  share  that  interest,  and  I  want  to 
support your efforts. 

I  am  a  senior  scientist,  both  at  a  national  laboratory  and  at  a 
university,  and  I  have  had  a  tremendous  positive  experience  from 
both of those institutions. They’re both very important parts of the 
scientific  enterprise  and  to  the  country.  I  may  be  unique  in  the 
sense that I have split funding from three of the Federal agencies— 
the Department of Energy, NASA, and NSF. All of these have been 
vital  in  the  development  of  scientific  advancement  and  research. 
Each has fulfilled a vital role. 

I encourage you to think about a broad spectrum, of the funding 
of  science,  because  all  of  science  is  a  fabric,  and  we  never  know 
what  discoveries  may  arise.  You  mentioned  the  human  genome 
which  came  originally  from  physical  discoveries  and  computer 
science  discoveries,  and  then  were  applied  in  the  medical  region. 
You have example after example of that. 

John  and  I  both  were  interested  in  studying  the  universe.  I  re-
called during my childhood, as I started to ask the question, ‘‘How 
did  we  turn  into  scientists?  How  did  we  get  into  this  channel?’’  It 
goes  back  to  riding  in  my  family  car,  and  seeing  the  Moon  out  the 
back  window,  and  the  Moon  follows  us  across  the  state,  and  so  I 
asked my parents, ‘‘How does that work?’’ And they explained that 
it follows every car. 

[Laughter.] 
Dr.  SMOOT.  That  was  just  so  startling  to  me  that  I’ve  always 
looked  at  the  sky  and  looked  at  the  world  as  something  wonderful 
that  could  be  explained  rationally.  Even  though  I’ve  learned  a  lot 
since  then,  I  still  have  that  curiosity.  I’m  thrilled  to  think  that 
young kids still do too, that they’re asking the same kinds of ques-
tions. I believe that preparing the next generation is extremely im-
portant.  I’m  using  part  of  my  resources  and  stature  as  a  Nobel 
Prize  winner  to  try  and  start  a  teacher’s  academy  for  middle  and 
high  school  science  teachers,  and  to  try  to  bring  about  the  public 
outreach of science in an integrated way, but also bring in the next 
generation of scientists, engineers and computer scientists, because 
the  whole  infrastructure  really  matters.  Between  the  combination 
of  steadily  rising  Federal  funding  in  the  environment  and  the  ap-
preciation  of  how  important  science  is  to  the  Nation,  whether  in 
solving  crises  or  just  making  economic  prosperity  work,  this  will 
encourage  young  people  to  dedicate  their  lives  to  try  to  make  this 
a better world. 

[The prepared statement of Dr. Smoot follows:] 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:23 Mar 19, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00022 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\79907.TXT JACKIE

19 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF GEORGE SMOOT,  PH.D.,  SENIOR SCIENTIST,  LAWRENCE 
BERKELEY NATIONAL LABORATORY,  PROFESSOR OF PHYSICS,  UNIVERSITY OF 
CALIFORNIA, BERKELEY 
Chairman  Kerry,  Ranking  Member  Ensign,  and  distinguished  Members  of  the 
Committee.  Thank  you  for  holding  this  important  hearing  and  for  recognizing  the 
importance  of  science  and  scientific  achievement  to  America’s  health  and  vitality. 
It  is  my  honor  and  pleasure  to  participate  in  this  inquiry  into  the  critical  role  that 
science plays in the life of our Nation and the world. 

My name is George Smoot and I am a Senior Scientist at Lawrence Berkeley Na-
tional  Laboratory  and  a  Professor  of  Physics  at  the  University  of  California  Berke-
ley.  I  am  perhaps  unique  in  having  received  roughly  comparable  and  vital  support 
from  the  Nation’s  three  primary  physical  science  agencies:  DOE,  NASA  and  NSF. 
As  a  scientist  at  Berkeley  Lab  and  a  professor  at  UC  Berkeley,  I  benefit  from  the 
great  advantages  provided  by  a  world-class  national  laboratory  and  one  of  the 
world’s  great  research  universities.  Both  play  critical  roles  in  promoting  America’s 
and the world’s scientific advancement through internationally recognized research, 
rigorous  education  of  future  scientists,  and  unique  scientific  tools  and  resources. 
Both  have  also  played  critical  roles  in  my  career  as  an  astrophysicist,  and  in  my 
work  that  led  to  the  2006  Nobel  Prize  in  Physics,  which  I  shared  with  my  distin-
guished colleague and fellow witness here today, John Mather. 

I  was  awarded  the  Nobel  Prize  for  my  role  in  discovering  experimental  evidence 
for  the  ‘‘Big  Bang,’’  the  primeval  explosion  that  began  the  universe.  This  evidence 
was  a  map  of  the  infant  universe  that  revealed  a  pattern  of  miniscule  temperature 
variations—‘‘hot’’ and ‘‘cold’’ regions with temperature differences of a hundred-thou-
sandth  of  a  degree.  These  temperature  variations,  created  when  the  universe  was 
smaller  than  the  smallest  dot  on  a  TV  screen,  are  thought  to  be  the  primordial 
‘‘seeds’’  that  grew  into  the  universe  of  galaxies  and  galaxy  clusters  we  see  today. 
The ‘‘map’’ of the universe that we created was produced in 1992 from data gathered 
by NASA’s Cosmic Background Explorer (COBE) satellite. 

It was exciting work. It was an exciting time. It was a time that ushered in what 

some call the Golden Age of Cosmology. 

Since our COBE results, more amazing discoveries have been made. We continue 
to  make  maps  of  the  universe  with  increasing  accuracy,  revealing  more  than  we 
ever imagined. We now know that there is something that makes up roughly three- 
quarters  of  our  universe  about  which  we  have  no  clue  as  to  what  it  is.  We  call  it 
Dark  Energy  for  lack  of  a  better  name,  and  it  is  driving  the  universe  to  expand  at 
an  accelerating  speed,  contrary  to  the  expected  force  of  gravity  slowing  the  expan-
sion down and ultimately pulling the universe back in on itself. 

New  maps  also  reveal  the  existence  of  Dark  Matter.  Although  it  is  estimated  to 
make  up  a  fifth  of  the  universe,  we  also  don’t  know  what  it  is.  Perhaps  this  un-
known  matter  will  someday  be  viewed  through  particle  physics  experiments,  or  be 
revealed  through  even  more  accurate  maps  of  the  universe.  What  we  are  sure  of  is 
that there will be new discoveries that continue to surprise us, yet will lead us clos-
er to a fuller understanding of the universe and the properties of matter and energy 
and space and time. 

The  discoveries  that  John  and  I  made,  as  well  as  those  made  by  others,  are  not 
the result of singular endeavors. They rest on the shoulders of many individuals and 
are made possible by funding from more than one Federal agency. It certainly took 
a  large  group  of  committed  scientists,  theorists,  technicians,  and  engineers  to  un-
cover the secrets of the infant universe. And, it took significant Federal funding. 

America’s  innovation  stems  from  the  creativity  that  institutions  like  Berkeley 
Lab,  UC  Berkeley,  U  Mass,  Stanford  and  Goddard  Space  Flight  Center  encourage 
and nurture in their students, researchers and professors. It stems from the intellec-
tual freedom that only inquiry at the most basic and theoretical level of science pro-
vides.  It  stems  from  the  commitment  of  Federal  investment  in  the  education  of  our 
children,  the  research  of  our  investigators,  and  the  development  and  maintenance 
of  our  scientific  infrastructure.  Science  is  an  organic  enterprise  and  does  not  exist 
in a vacuum. Science flows from its environment and is nurtured by steady funding 
and new young educated minds. If adequately supported these ingredients incubate 
and grow. They lay the foundation, the seeds, for the next generation of discoveries 
and innovations. 

My  early  work  as  a  post-doctoral  physicist  at  Berkeley  Lab  was  funded  through 
the  United  States  Department  of  Energy’s  Office  of  Science.  I  had  the  very  great 
fortune of working with legendary scientists. Nobelists like Luis Alvarez encouraged 
me to ‘‘think big’’ and then gave me the space and freedom to do so. It was the fund-
ing  from  DOE  that  provided  the  foundation  that  allowed  my  work  to  progress.  It 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:23 Mar 19, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00023 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\79907.TXT JACKIE

20 

enabled  me  to  build  my  expertise  and  to  organize  the  necessary  team  to  tackle  the 
hardest questions. 

One point that I hope to leave with you today is that the U.S. Department of En-
ergy  is  the  major  funder  of  the  physical  sciences  in  the  United  States.  What  does 
that mean? It means that DOE is the largest investor in the development and main-
tenance  of  our  Nation’s  scientific  resources,  both  human  and  infrastructure,  in  the 
research fields of chemistry, astronomy, all forms of physics, material sciences, and 
more.  From  its  national  scientific  user  facilities,  such  as  synchrotron  light  sources, 
electron microscopes and particle accelerators, to programmatic research funding at 
its national labs and at research universities, DOE is supporting the underpinnings 
of American innovation. 

The  Department  of  Energy  has  also  played  a  unique  and  critical  role  in  training 
America’s scientists and engineers for more than 50 years. I am an example of this 
support,  as  are  many  scientists  of  my  generation.  These  scientists  and  engineers 
have made major contributions to the United State’s economic and scientific pre-em-
inence.  The  nation’s  grand  challenges,  such  as  our  current  and  future  energy  and 
environmental needs, will only be solved through scientific and technological innova-
tion developed by a highly skilled workforce. The DOE’s Workforce Development for 
Teachers and Scientists program is a catalyst for the training of the next generation 
of scientists. Through this program DOE national laboratories provide a wide range 
of educational opportunities for more than 280,000 educators and students on an an-
nual basis. It is particularly important that we continue to extend and expand such 
opportunities  to  our  students  and,  critically,  to  our  teachers  of  science,  technology, 
engineering,  and  mathematics.  The  entire  science  education  infrastructure  from  K– 
12 through undergraduate students, and graduate students to postdoctoral scholars 
is  the  pipeline  of  future  scientists  and  technologists.  The  educators,  mentors  and 
role models are the pumps that bring them along, prepare and excite them for their 
challenging and rewarding work. 

However,  as  I  intimated  earlier,  research  and  scientific  training  is  underwritten 
by  more  than  just  funding  from  DOE.  In  my  case,  I  have  been  honored  to  receive 
funding  from  the  National  Science  Foundation  and,  of  course,  from  NASA.  Each 
agency  played  a  crucial  role  in  my  development  as  a  scientist  and  in  the  develop-
ment of the programs on which I worked. 

My  group  has  received  substantial  funding  from  the  NSF  over  many  years  that 
included  support  for  graduate  students  and  postdoctoral  scholars,  as  well  as  access 
to NSF sites and facilities, such as the South Pole station. In fact, NSF funds prob-
ably exceeded or matched DOE funding of my work over the years. 

In the mix of Federal support for my research, DOE funding served two incredibly 
important  roles:  (1)  stability  and  longer-term  risk,  and  (2)  development  of  novel  in-
strumentation  later  used  on  NASA  platforms  (aircraft,  balloons,  satellites)  and  at 
NSF sites. DOE provided steady and reliable program funding that allowed develop-
ment of new concepts, instrumentation and ultimately fields. NSF and NASA fund-
ing was in general for specific projects or relatively short, and well-defined, research 
objectives  (often  prototyped  with  DOE  funds).  The  NSF  could  be  counted  on  to  be 
interested  in  funding  specific  observations  or  developing  new  approaches  that  were 
linked  to  their  program  disciplines.  Like  DOE,  NSF  also  liked  to  involve  graduate 
students  and  undergraduates  in  research  and  often  provided  modest  additional 
funds  for  that  purpose.  This  activity  helped  funnel  a  number  of  bright  young  stu-
dents on into graduate school and Ph.D. programs. 

A  very  critical  result  of  NSF  funding  was  the  creation  of  the  Center  for  Particle 
Astrophysics.  This  center  revolutionized  the  approach  to  the  field.  Now  essentially 
every  major  first-rate  university  has  a  cosmology  center  modeled  after  it.  The  Cen-
ter  brought  together  a  number  of  groups  and  institutions  to  push  forward  our  un-
derstanding of Dark Matter and the accelerating universe, leading to the realization 
that Dark Energy makes up the majority of the Universe. The vibrancy of the com-
bined  programs  of  science  and  people,  in  addition  to  education  and  outreach  pro-
grams, had a profound effect of productivity and creativity. It impressed all who saw 
it.  Because  of  its  success,  the  NSF  has  continued  and  expanded  their  center  pro-
grams. 

This illustrates my second point that I hope you will take to heart and leave here 
today remembering. America’s scientific leadership and capacity for innovation stem 
broadly  from  the  Federal  Government’s  investment  in  a  rich  portfolio  of  research. 
Therefore, it is critical that all Federal funding of research be increased. 

The scientific community is very pleased to see both the Administration’s and the 
Congress’  commitment  to  doubling  the  budgets  of  the  NSF,  the  DOE  Office  of 
Science  and  of  NIST.  However,  NASA’s  science  budget,  the  NIH  and  DOD’s  sci-
entific programs play important roles as well and should not be overlooked. Passage 
last week of Senate Bill 761, the America COMPETES Act, was a vital development 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:23 Mar 19, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00024 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\79907.TXT JACKIE

21 

and  your  work  on  this  milestone  legislation  is  recognized  by  all  of  us  interested  in 
American  science.  However,  more  must  be  done  to  raise  the  level  of  research  fund-
ing significantly higher, and for all Federal research agencies. 

The third and final point that I want to leave you with, is that Congress and the 
Administration  must  stay  vigilant  in  your  commitment  to  long-term,  basic  science 
that  has  no  obvious  immediate  commercial  application.  Without  this  foundational 
research the really big, transformational discoveries and leaps in understanding will 
not occur. Basic science is the beginning of the innovation pipeline that leads to rev-
olutionary technologies. 

Take the prospects for advancements in energy research. Although progress in the 
effectiveness and cost efficiency of existing technologies, such as current methods of 
ethanol  production  and  silicon-based  photovoltaic  cells,  will  happen,  many  believe 
that their learning curves are flattening out and that improvements will not get us 
to  a  place  where  significant  inroads  are  made  in  carbon  emission  reductions  or  en-
ergy independence. 

However, some of the most promising avenues for developing new, clean and revo-
lutionary energy technologies are solutions rooted in fundamental basic science. For 
example,  the  DOE  Office  of  Science  is  funding  new  bioenergy  research  centers  that 
will investigate all of the scientific aspects of developing new cleaner fuels from bio-
mass.  We  have  known  for  a  long  time  that  we  could  produce  liquid  fuel  from  bio-
mass;  the  problem  has  been  that  it  is  prohibitively  expensive—we  had  to  put  the 
biomass  in  acid  baths  to  free  up  the  chemicals  and  then  treat  the  resulting  liquid, 
consuming a lot of energy while doing it. The research challenge is to find, and per-
haps  design  and  synthesize,  new  biological  organisms  and  enzymes  that  will  make 
the  conversion  process  cheap  enough  to  compete  against  the  cost  of  gasoline.  The 
new tools developed with the support of the Office of Science in genomics, computer 
modeling  and  synthetic  biology  put  this  within  our  reach,  but  much  more  work 
needs to be done. 

In  another  example,  the  Office  of  Science  is  funding  advanced  research  in  nano-
technologies  which  offer  the  best  hope  for  developing  new  energy  storage  systems 
that  will  be  critical  for  making  solar  and  wind  economically  attractive  alternatives. 
Why  is  new  nanotechnology  so  important  for  the  future  growth  of  solar  and  wind 
energy? These resources are available only while the sun shines or the wind blows, 
and that may be at times when they are not needed. Inexpensive ways to store that 
energy  would  make  them  useful  resources  all  of  the  time.  And  why  is  nanotech-
nology  so  important  to  developing  new  energy  storage  systems?  Our  future  success 
in  energy  storage  depends  on  being  able  to  build  batteries  that  will  be  able  to  hold 
much  higher  charges,  and  be  discharged  much  more  rapidly,  than  present  ones  do; 
the  way  to  achieve  these  advances  is  through  advanced  nanotechnology  research— 
again, fundamental basic science. 

In  conclusion,  I  applaud  the  renewed  focus  that  the  Senate,  the  House  and  the 
Administration  have  placed  on  the  need  to  maintain  America’s  international  com-
petitiveness  through  nurturing  innovation.  Innovation,  like  science,  is  organic.  No 
one  knows  where  the  next  big  ‘‘breakthrough’’  will  occur  and  where  it  will  lead  us. 
No  one  can  guess  who  will  be  the  next  young  ‘‘Einstein’’  or  ‘‘Edison’’  that  takes  the 
world  in  new  directions.  Therefore,  it  is  critical  that  every  child,  every  student, 
every researcher and every creative idea have the potential to blossom. You, as the 
stewards  of  our  government,  have  the  power  of  the  purse  and  the  legislative  pen 
that can ensure America continues to invest in a broad portfolio of scientific endeav-
ors,  more  aggressively  invests  in  math  and  science  education,  provides  the  updated 
scientific infrastructure needed for 21st Century science, and encourages a research 
environment that embraces risks and awards creativity. 

In times of crisis the Nation mobilizes its science enterprise. Whether in response 
to  hostile  outside  threats,  challenges  to  our  preeminence,  such  as  in  the  case  of 
Sputnik,  or  as  with  today’s  energy-based  climate  and  economic  security  concerns, 
the Nation turns to scientific and technological solutions. For future crises it is crit-
ical that the country keep a broad, vital and strong science infrastructure. 

Even  without  the  grand  challenges  to  address,  science  impacts  everyday  life  and 
makes  our  world  a  better  place.  It  is  clear  to  all  that  the  economic  prosperity,  per-
sonal health, and world leadership of the country and its population rests upon the 
products  of  basic  scientific  research  and  the  vitality  of  our  science  enterprise.  The 
country’s place in the world will directly reflect the level of its science. Any country 
that wishes to be a world leader must be a world leader in science. 

Thank  you,  again,  for  the  opportunity  to  provide  testimony  on  this  important 

topic. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:23 Mar 19, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00025 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\79907.TXT JACKIE

22 

Senator  PRYOR.  Let  me,  if  I  may,  lead  off  on  the  questions,  but 
what I’d like to do, for the Senators here, is, I’d like to have a free- 
flowing  question-and-answer.  I  wasn’t  going  to  really  do  rounds, 
rather just a general discussion of things. 

Likewise,  my  first  question’s  just  a  question  for  the  panel  gen-

erally. 

I  understand,  by  the  way,  that  we  are  going  to  have  a  vote 
around 4:30. I just got word on that. So, we’ll figure that out when 
the  time  comes.  We  may  have  to  slip  out  for  a  few  minutes  and 
we’ll figure out if we’re going to recess the hearing or exactly what 
we’ll do. 

Let me ask, I think that sometimes Congress and the public have 
a  difficult  time  really  understanding  the  importance  of  basic  re-
search.  It’s  just  not  readily  apparent  to  people  sometimes.  If  I  can 
explain to people in my state or people around the country, why it’s 
important and what will be happening over the next 5 years, some 
of  the  emerging  discoveries,  and  the  applications  of  what  you  all 
do. Help us by explaining the significance of your research and why 
it’s  important  to  the  quality  of  life,  not  just  here  in  the  U.S.,  but 
around  the  world,  also  maybe  what  products  or  you  know,  what 
may flow from that out on the marketplace. 

I’ll just throw that out to everybody. 
Dr.  KORNBERG.  Let  me  explain  in  the  following  way.  A  good  ex-
ample that everyone knows about are the benefits of modern medi-
cine.  And  there  are  few,  if  any,  of  us  who  don’t  either  owe  our 
health,  or  even  the  lives,  of  family  members  to  modern  medicine. 
It’s  worth  bearing  in  mind  it’s  only  100  years  old.  It  wasn’t  much 
over  100  years  ago,  the  only  cure  for  disease  was  bleeding.  And 
then,  if  you  look  back  at  the  history  over  the  last  hundred  years, 
what  you  discover  is  that  virtually  every  major  medical  advance 
was  made  by  the  pursuit  of  knowledge  for  its  own  sake,  and  not 
for the purpose of advancing medicine. And to give you some exam-
ples:  X-rays,  antibiotics,  medical  imaging—for  example,  magnetic 
resonance  imaging—recombinant  DNA.  These  advances  were  all 
due to the pursuit of knowledge for its own sake. There is no exam-
ple  that  I  know  of,  or  that  I  believe  can  be  cited,  to  the  contrary. 
So,  the  lesson  of  the  history  is  clear:  If  you  wish  to  improve 
human  health  in  the  future,  there  is  one,  and  only  one,  way  to  do 
it. If you wish to cure AIDS, if you wish to cure cancer, if you wish 
to  cure  Alzheimer’s,  it  will  not  be  accomplished  by  a  targeted  ap-
proach  directed  toward  the  ravages  of  that  disease.  It  will  only  be 
accomplished by the unfettered pursuit of basic knowledge. Discov-
eries  will  be  made,  quite  unintentionally,  that  eradicate  these  dis-
eases. 

Dr.  FIRE.  But  one  aspect  of—if  I  may,  one  aspect  of  this  that’s 
worth stressing is that, as scientists we have a responsibility, when 
we talk about the consequences of our research, to talk about both 
the wonderful possibilities and also the limitations and challenges. 
And  so,  anytime  we  say,  ‘‘This  is  what’s  going  to  be  happening  in 
5  years,’’  if  we  knew  what  was  going  to  be  a  good  treatment  for  a 
disease, we’d want it now. But of course there’s always a great deal 
of uncertainty to anything in the future. 

One  of  the  nice  examples  of  this  is  the  monoclonal  antibody  in-
dustry.  This  industry  comes  from  a  discovery  in  1975  which  re-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:23 Mar 19, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00026 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\79907.TXT JACKIE

23 

sulted  in  the  Nobel  Prize  for  the  British  and  German  scientists. 
They  developed  monoclonal  antibodies:  very  specific  molecular  ma-
chines  that  would  target  individual  molecules.  Everybody  imme-
diately  thought,  ‘‘These  will  be  great  as  therapeutics.’’  And  there 
was a lot of ‘‘hype,’’ so to speak. There was a lot of excitement. But 
initially  it  didn’t  work.  We  didn’t  know  enough  about  the  immune 
system  at  the  time  to  be  able  to  make  monoclonals  work  as  thera-
peutics.  Years  went  by  when  some  great  ideas  for  companies  that 
would  start  from  this  ‘‘tanked’’.  Fortunately  there  was  research 
that went on at that time that was very successful in the academic 
sector, because the companies that tried to do this weren’t success-
ful. 

And  then,  starting  in  the  mid-1990s,  there  was  enough  informa-
tion to make monoclonals work. Now they’re a major economic com-
ponent  of  the  biomedical  industry.  They’re  also  a  major  medical 
treatment,  particularly  against  different  types  of  cancer,  against 
macular  degeneration,  against  other  things.  So,  when  we  talk 
about  the  consequences  of  our  research—and  when  others  talk 
about the consequences of their research—it’s often difficult to pre-
dict  what’s  going  to  happen.  And  the  investments  that  are  made 
now  probably  aren’t  going  to  have  an  effect  in  5  years.  That,  I 
think, is a realistic statement. 
Senator PRYOR. Dr. Smoot? 
Dr. SMOOT. Yes, I wanted to elaborate on two medical examples, 

because that’s something people relate to. 

First,  I  want  to  expand  on  the  earliest  one:  X-rays.  If  you  think 
that  NIH  or  somebody  would  have  funded  Roentgen,  who  discov-
ered  X-rays,  this  did  not  and  would  not  happen;  he  was  trying  to 
study  whether  radioactivity  came  from  the  sun.  Why  would  you 
fund  that  for  medical  research?  A  month  after  he  published  his 
paper, the first X-ray machine appeared in the first hospital. Three 
months  later,  it  was  in  15  hospitals.  It  was  so  obvious  looking  at 
the picture of his wife’s hand with the wedding rings and the bones 
that this is a way to look inside people without cutting them open. 
This  was  an  immediate  clear  application.  That’s  one  example  of  a 
key medical discovery coming from way out in left field. 

The  other  example  that  I’ll  give  you  is  an  example  of  what  hap-
pens  when  the  technology  comes  from  an  unexpected  source  and 
matures. This is something that will supposedly happen in approxi-
mately 2 years—it’s on a 4-year plan, and it’s on schedule: That is 
a new cure for malaria, which now kills annually 1.5 million people 
in the world today. It has been discovered there is a plant that will 
cure  malaria—which  is  now  resistant  to  quinine—so  that’s  a  seri-
ous  problem  in  the  world.  People  have  realized  how  to  take  the 
gene  from  that  plant  and  put  it  in  bacteria,  and  then  the  bacteria 
will  produce  this  cure.  The  World  Health  Organization  is  funding 
the  combination  of  Jay  Keasling,  who  is  at  UC  Berkeley,  his  lab-
oratory  and  a  private  company  (Amyris  Biotechnologies,  Inc.)—to 
build  this,  and  they  claim  that  in  2  years  they  will  deliver  the 
cures for malaria at 25 cents a dose. 

That’s  really  impressive.  But  what  it  tells  you  is,  once  you  truly 
understand  a  disease,  and  understand  the  cure—the  molecular 
cures  and  so  forth—you  can  do  it  at  a  reasonable  price.  When  you 
look at the escalating healthcare costs, you realize that one reason 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:23 Mar 19, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00027 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\79907.TXT JACKIE

24 

they  are  so  high  is  we  have  an  aging  population  that’s  living 
longer.  This  is  due  to  our  successes,  but  we  still  have  healthcare 
problems.  Once  you  understand  the  diseases,  you  can  treat  them 
at  a  much  lower  cost,  and  that’s  the  only  way  we’re  going  to  con-
tain the fact that people are going to live to 120, right? 

Senator PRYOR. Anybody else want to take that? 
Yes? 
Dr. MATHER. Yes, I’d like to, sort of, move the discussion over to-
ward  the  Space  Race,  which  is  almost  50  years  old  now.  It  began 
with  a  plan  for  pure  curiosity-driven  research  in  the  International 
Geophysical  Year.  Auroras  were  of  great  interest.  We  wanted  to 
know local things about our star, and our neighborhood around the 
Earth.  And  I  was  excited  about  it.  But,  you  know,  Sputnik  went 
up  as  part  of  that  international  plan,  and  suddenly  this  country 
was  absolutely  petrified.  So,  it  had  a  curiosity-driven  program, 
which was international in nature, had instantaneous international 
ramifications, and obviously led to huge investments, eventually, in 
communications,  in  weather  satellites,  so  we  know  whether  it’s 
going  to  rain,  in  computers,  in  monitoring  the  rest  of  the  world 
with satellites, in astronomical capabilities to look out at all wave-
lengths where the air blocks our view. 

Now even moving on toward looking down at the Earth and tell-
ing  whether  it’s  getting  warmer  or  colder  or  what,  and  what  are 
the long-term trends on the Earth. And even a military application, 
the  Global  Positioning  Sensor  System,  is  now  something  everyone 
can have on a cell phone. And it’s a completely amazing thing that 
it was all kicked off by curiosity-driven research. 

Senator  STEVENS.  I  have  been  around  here  for  a  long  time,  and 
I’ve probably added more money to more budgets for basic research 
than  any  Senator  in  history.  But  I  also  see  that  we  have,  now, 
enormous  foundations,  enormous  private-sector  money—Gates, 
Google, Buffett, you name them—enormous sectors of money. They 
don’t seem to be going into this field, because they see the amount 
of  Federal  money  we’re  putting  into  it.  What  do  you  say  about 
that? Is there a balance there somewhere? And how much do you— 
have  you  gotten  private  money  for—to  supplement  your  Federal 
grants?  Where  is  the  balance,  in  terms  of  society,  for  basic  re-
search,  when  we  have  these  enormous  funds  out  there,  and  they 
don’t want to put them in where you are, because the Federal Gov-
ernment’s already monopolizing the field? 

Dr. KORNBERG. You know, that’s the—it’s very important to bear 
in  mind  that  the  Federal  Government  has  instituted,  first  of  all,  a 
system for the distribution of funds, which is uniquely effective—— 
Senator  STEVENS.  You’re  not  answering  my  question,  now.  I’m— 
I  don’t  have  a  lot  of  time.  Please  answer  the  question.  Is  there  a 
balance  between,  and  do  you  seek,  private  funding  as  you’re  seek-
ing—— 

Dr. KORNBERG. OK. 
Senator STEVENS.—an increase in Federal funding? 
Dr.  KORNBERG.  So,  I  wanted  to  explain  that,  first  of  all,  the  pri-
vate  funds  are  far,  far  less,  and,  in  no  way,  adequate.  The  private 
funds are less than 10 percent of what is available—what the Fed-
eral Government spends, which is, itself, presently inadequate. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:23 Mar 19, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00028 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\79907.TXT JACKIE

25 

Senator STEVENS. Federal Government only entails about—in my 
last  memory,  about—somewhere  around  11  percent  of  the  GNP. 
Now—so, let’s not tell me that there’s more—— 

Dr. KORNBERG. I’m sorry. 
Senator  STEVENS.—more  funds  in  the  Federal  Treasury  than 
there are out there in the private sector. There are enormous sums. 
I  just  want  to—do  you  seek  increases  in  private-sector  funding  as 
you’re seeking—here—I don’t disagree with doing that, but are you 
seeking similar increases from the private sector? 

Dr.  KORNBERG.  Please  understand,  there  are  two  components  to 
the private sector, the foundations and companies. The foundations 
have far less funds, much less than 10 percent of what the Federal 
Government  makes  available,  which  is,  itself,  inadequate.  Second, 
companies  will  never  invest  in  research  that  requires  25  to  50 
years to do. They are looking for short-term gain. And so, it’s hope-
less to look to them. On the contrary, they look to the Government, 
and they look to us, for the lifeblood of their industry. 

Senator  STEVENS.  Well,  I’m  not  totally  satisfied  with  that,  be-
cause  we’ve  doubled  research  funding  for  NIH,  we’ve  doubled  re-
search  funding  in  basic  sciences  since  I’ve  been  here—more  than 
doubled. We have not seen the emphasis of going to the private sec-
tor  for  support  for  basic  research  that  existed  before  all  this  Fed-
eral  money  came  in.  When  I  first  came  in,  there  was  very  little 
Federal  money  going  into  basic  research.  Very  little.  DARPA  was 
one of the first real sectors of increased Federal funding, and that’s 
within  my  lifetime,  within  my  time  here  in  the  Senate.  So,  before 
that, private sector—the research base of this country was the pri-
vate sector. But it seems that as we increase Federal funding, they 
pull back. And I’m sincere in asking you—— 

Dr. KORNBERG. I understand. 
Senator  STEVENS.—I  think  you  should  be  seeking  additional 
funds  from  the  private  sector.  Those  foundations  are  gigantic.  And 
several  of  them  gave  $30  billion  last  year  to  various  functions. 
Now—and what you’re talking about is not $30 billion. We haven’t 
increased your funding by $30 billion. 

Dr.  KORNBERG.  I  can’t  speak  to  the  $30  billion,  because  I’m  un-
aware  of  funds  even  approaching  that  scale  being  available  from 
any  other  source  to  our  research.  But  in  regard  to  the—seeking 
funds from the private sector, we struggle all the time. When Fed-
eral funds fall short, as they have done of late, and people are leav-
ing  our  field,  we  try  desperately,  and  we  appeal  to  every  other 
source.  We  do  obtain  small  amounts  of  money,  occasionally,  from 
some non-Federal source, but there’s no way they can now, or ever 
will,  match,  for  value,  as  well  as  for  quantity,  what  is  distributed 
by the Federal Government. 

Senator  STEVENS.  Federal  Government  doesn’t  have  any  money, 
except  what  it  takes  from  you.  So,  don’t  tell  me  we’ve  got  more 
money than the private sector. We don’t. The question is how much 
is  going  to  be  dedicated  to  the  kind  of  research  that  you  want  us 
to  do,  and  do  so  well.  I  just  think  there  ought  to  be  some  balance 
here,  in  terms  of  the  amount  of  money  you  ask  us  to  provide  from 
the  taxpayers  and  the  amount  of  money  you  go  out  and  solicit—— 

Dr. KORNBERG. Please—— 
Senator STEVENS.—from the private sector. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:23 Mar 19, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00029 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\79907.TXT JACKIE

26 

Dr.  KORNBERG.  Please  understand,  the  private  sector  makes  an 
enormous  investment  in  development,  based  upon  our  discoveries. 
They  invest  massive  amounts—I  think,  far  beyond  the  $30  billion 
to which you alluded—in exploiting the discoveries made from Fed-
eral funds to multiply the value of that Federal investment. 

Senator  STEVENS.  Well,  don’t  shoot  the  messenger,  but  we’re 
hearing this. We’re hearing that we’re reaching the point that we’re 
putting up a lot more taxpayers’ money for things that the private 
sector could, and should, do. 

Dr.  KORNBERG.  Well,  I  would  respectfully  suggest  that  the  pub-
lic—private  sector  is  trying  its  best,  and  that  the  argument  that 
has been put to you on those lines is mistaken. 

Dr.  FIRE.  I  can,  maybe,  tell  a  little  story.  We  had  a  research 
project  that  was  certainly  not  ready  to  be  funded  by  NIH.  And 
there was a private foundation in that field that funded new work. 
Ours  was  long-term  research  and  we  said  that  this  wouldn’t  be 
really  valuable  for  about  10  or  20  years.  So,  we  put  in  an  applica-
tion.  That  agency  had  sent  out  a  request  for  proposals,  and  there 
were  hundreds  that  came  in,  all  related  to  that  particular  area  of 
science—medicine.  And  they  had  to  make  a  decision,  in  the  short 
term,  on  what  they  could  fund—what  they  felt  would  benefit  what 
was essentially their client base, which was a specific set of people 
that  were  affected  now  with  the  disease.  Our  proposal  was  cer-
tainly  not  amongst  those  that  would  be  most  highly  beneficial  to 
anybody that has the disease now. And, of course, it wasn’t funded 
by the foundation. I think that the private sector, both foundations 
and companies, are doing the best that they can, but they have lim-
itations,  too.  If  you  look  at  their  ability  to  fund  really  basic  re-
search  into  fundamental  questions,  it’s  quite  limited.  They  look  to 
themselves  sometimes  to  leverage  given  areas,  where  the  research 
will  get  to  a  point  where  then  it’s  federally  supportable.  They  look 
to go into areas that might be difficult to be funded otherwise. 

Also  remember  that  foundations  and  industry  look  for  support 
from  the  Government—this  includes  industry  looking  for  early 
leads  on  developments  that  could  be  useful  for  therapeutics  that 
could  be  useful  and  economically  beneficial.  They  (foundations  and 
companies)  also  look  for  guidance  from  basic  scientists  that  can 
work in a setting where there isn’t a requirement to make a profit 
or focus on one disease. 

I  think  if  you  were  to  get  rid  of  a  certain  fraction  of  the  NIH 
budget, and hope that this would be taken over by the private sec-
tor,  you  wouldn’t  get  the  same  kind  of  science  done,  and  both  the 
companies  and  foundations  that  would  be  trying  to  take  up  the 
slack,  and  the  scientists  trying  to  do  the  work  would  be  unable  to 
do the kinds of work that they need to do. And so, the assumption 
that  anyone  could  ‘‘take  up  the  slack’’  in  federal  funding  would 
hurt both the basic and applied at the same time. 

Senator  PRYOR.  OK.  You  all  may  have  wondered  what  these 
lights are and what these buzzers are. That means we’re in a vote, 
and we’re more than halfway through the vote now. 

So, what I’m going to do is recess the Committee for 5 to 10 min-
utes.  I  think  I’ll  be  back  within  10  minutes.  And  we’ll  pick  up 
where we left off. 

So, we’ll be in recess for—subject to the call of the Chair. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:23 Mar 19, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00030 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\79907.TXT JACKIE

27 

[Recess.] 
Senator  PRYOR.  We’ll  call  the  Committee  back  to  order.  Thank 
you all for being patient. We just had a vote. And now, see the two 
little  lights  on,  that  means  we’re  in  a  quorum  call,  which  means 
they’re trying to figure out what to do next on the floor. 

Let  me  just  run  through  a  few  questions.  And,  again,  I  under-
stand  that  you  all  need  to  go  to  the  White  House  so  maybe  10–15 
more  minutes  max,  of  questions,  and  then  we’ll  let  you  all  get  on 
your way. 

Let  me  ask  a  couple  of  questions  here,  quickly.  And,  again,  just 
kind  of  free-flow  an  answer,  whoever  wants  to  jump  in,  we’d  love 
to  have  your  thoughts.  Like  I  mentioned,  your  statements  will  al-
ready  be  part  of  the  record,  so  please  know  that  those  points  have 
been made publicly. 

We talked about funding basic research, and the lack of risk-tak-
ing on the part of Federal agencies. The NIH budget doubled in the 
5 years from Fiscal Year 1999 through 2003, but has remained flat 
since then. The percentage of first-time applicants for NIH investi-
gator-initiated  grants  has  been  steadily  falling.  We  see  the  same 
problem at the NSF, where new investigators have a lower success 
rate  than  overall  NSF  grant  applications.  What  steps  should  the 
Federal  Government  be  taking  to  ensure  that  high-risk,  high-re-
ward  research  is  still  being  funded?  So,  who  wants  to  jump  in  on 
that? 

Dr. KORNBERG. There’s a—such a simple—if I may—— 
Senator PRYOR. Go ahead. 
Dr.  KORNBERG.—simple—there’s  an  answer—a  simple  answer  to 
that  question  at  one  level  in  regard  to  NIH,  and  that  is  to  restore 
what was lost during the period of flat funding, and then maintain 
a  steady  and  reliable  budget  after  that  time.  It’s—the—filling  the 
immediate—the gap that has been created, the emergency that has 
arisen,  but  it’s  first  necessary  to  keep  some  of  the  best  investiga-
tors still in the system who would otherwise be lost, and then, after 
that,  simply  to  create  a  climate  of  reliability  so  that  people  know 
that  if  they  undertake  research  that  may  take  a  very  long  time, 
and that is risky in nature, they won’t be cutoff in the middle and 
unable to complete the work. 

Senator PRYOR. Right. Anybody want to add anything to that? 
Dr. SMOOT. Yes, I think that when you think about what reliable 
funding  means,  it  means  going  up  at  least  as  fast  as  inflation.  In 
a  reasonable  enterprise,  you  would  expect  that  science  funding 
would  go  up  with  either  the  overall  Federal  budget  or  the  GDP, 
just  because  you’re  expecting  science  as  a  long-term  investment 
that returns itself in the economy. If you want the economy to keep 
growing,  you  have  to  keep,  you  know,  your  investment  level  up  at 
that appropriate percentage. 

Senator  PRYOR.  Sometimes  here  in  Washington—I  don’t  want  to 
throw  stones  at  anybody,  but  let’s  just  say—sometimes  here  in 
Washington, when we talk about research, it—we naturally, some-
times,  talk  about  the  ethical  use  of  the  research  and  the  things 
that flow from that research, and risks that are involved. And, you 
know,  one  of  the  most  high-profile  controversies  we’ve  had  is  em-
bryonic stem cell research. But something that we’ve been working 
on  in  this  Committee,  the  full  Committee,  is  nanotechnology  and 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:23 Mar 19, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00031 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\79907.TXT JACKIE

28 

some  of  the  environmental  risks  and  challenges  there,  that  are— 
some  of  those  are  very  unknown  at  this  point.  So,  I  have  a  ques-
tion,  again,  for  you.  When  Congress,  or  when  the  President,  puts 
limitations on research, either through Executive Order or through 
national  law,  what  effect—or  maybe  it  could  be  just  the  policies 
that  the  various  Federal  agencies  have—but  what  effect  does  that 
have on you, in terms of conducting research, peer review, scientific 
integrity? What does that really do to you? 

Dr.  FIRE.  Maybe  I  can  say  something  there.  I  think  there  have 
to be limits on research. There have been horrible experiences over 
history  where  research  without  any  kind  of  oversight  has  caused 
trouble. So I think all of us accept that there are societal rules that 
have to be made at a governmental level and an institutional level. 
That  we  have  to  follow  these  rules,  I  think  we’re  all  comfortable 
with.  We  will  work  as  best  we  can  within  those  limits  to  deliver 
the science and the cures and the economic benefits. This is a con-
versation. If there is a case where we feel that a decision has been 
made  that  has  really  hurt—has  a  negative  consequence,  it’s  some-
thing that we should be communicating back to this body, or other 
bodies,  saying  ‘‘Here  is  something  where  a  great  opportunity  is 
being  lost.’’  And  then,  the  debate  has  to  occur  on  the  public  level, 
not  just  one  way,  but  a  dialogue.  We  can’t  say,  ‘‘As  scientists,  you 
need  to  do  this.’’  These  are  really  public  questions  to  wrestle  with. 
And  so,  we  will  work  within  whatever  constraints  we’re  given  by 
society to do the best science we can. 

Senator PRYOR. OK. Let me say—— 
Dr. SMOOT. But let me interrupt, because—— 
Senator PRYOR. Yes, go ahead. 
Dr.  SMOOT.—in  the  case  of  stem  cell  research,  you  actually  see 
that  one  of  the  things  that  happens  is  some  people  move  their  re-
search  overseas  into  communities  where  it  was  not  constrained. 
And  those  are  the  places  that  it’s  going  forward.  The  reason  they 
did  it,  it  was—they  believed  that  it  was  really  going  to  be  ex-
tremely  valuable,  in  terms  of  the  advances  that  could  be  made. 
What  you  may  also  see  is  people  going  overseas  for  medical  treat-
ment. 

Senator PRYOR. Right. 
We’ve been joined by Senator Klobuchar. 
Let  me  ask  one  more  question,  and  then  I’d  like  to  turn  it  over 

to her if she has any questions or comments. 

Another debate that we have here in Congress is not directly re-
lated to you, but, I think, does touch on your world of research and 
academic  pursuits,  and  that  is  immigration  policy.  This  is  some-
thing that—last year, there was a lot of discussion about immigra-
tion here in the Congress. And from my standpoint, unfortunately, 
it tended to focus on border control and Hispanic individuals enter-
ing  the  country  illegally.  That  seemed  to  be  the  brunt  of  the  rhet-
oric.  But  I  know  that  immigration  plays  a  key  role  in  your  world, 
in  the  world  of  research  and  academia.  Give—just  give  us  some 
general  thoughts  on  what  you  think  the  immigration  policy  should 
be in this country as it relates to you. I mean, I understand every-
body  has  strong  feelings  about  lots  of  different  pieces  of  immigra-
tion, but just as it relates to what you all do, what type of immigra-
tion policy should we have? 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:23 Mar 19, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00032 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\79907.TXT JACKIE

29 

Dr.  SMOOT.  I  have  an  anecdote.  I  have  five  graduate  students, 
and  three  of  them  come  from  foreign  countries—one  from  Korea, 
one  from  Mexico,  which  comes  directly  to  the  Hispanic  issue—he 
happens to be extremely good. One of the things you should realize 
is  that  Mexico  graduates  more  engineers  than  the  United  States 
does.  When  you  start  thinking  about  who  are  you  letting  into  the 
country,  you  start  thinking  about  what  skills  you  need.  The  other 
anecdote  at  that  level—and  I  can  do  one  on  both  sides—is  that  I 
have  watched  the  applications  to  graduate  school  over  25  years, 
and in the beginning we would get, like 100 applicants from foreign 
countries,  and  we  would  get  on  the  scale  of  600  from  the  United 
States,  now—and,  of  the  100,  a  lot  of  them  were  unqualified,  but 
now  we  get,  like  500  from  overseas,  and  we  get  400  or  500  from 
then  U.S.,  and  the  ones  from  overseas,  on  the  average,  are  better 
qualified. 

Unfortunately, we have seen a partial failure to attract and edu-
cate  young  people  in  science  in  the  United  States,  and  we’ve  seen 
that  the  way  we  get  scientists  and  engineers  and  computer  sci-
entists  in  the  United  States  is  by  importing  skilled  people  from 
abroad  and  trying  to  keep  them  here.  So,  it’s  actually  vital  to  the 
scientific  enterprise  and  the  economic  enterprise  to  the  United 
States to be able to bring skilled, intelligent people into the country 
and  make  that  process  work  smoothly.  So,  the  issue  always  was 
one  of—first,  of  getting  bodies  into  the  U.S.,  but  now  of  getting 
skilled  people  who  are  going  to  contribute  to  society,  and  make 
them welcome, and give them opportunity. 

Senator PRYOR. Any other comments on that? 
Dr. FIRE. I think—— 
Senator PRYOR. All right. Well—— 
Dr. FIRE.—that making non-citizen scientists welcome is a really 
useful goal. Because many of our scientists (including students and 
postdocs)  have  to  go  through  the  system  of  immigration,  we  have 
a  vested  interest  in  making  that  system  work.  I  think  all  of  the 
caution that we take is necessary, but what do our guests see now? 
As  they  see  some  of  the  difficulties  that  the  immigration  system 
has,  some  of  the  lack  of  respect  that  they’re  shown  as  they  go 
through  the  system—this  is  really  problematic.  And  so,  some  kind 
of  a  personal  treatment  from  people  in  the  immigration  services— 
where  they’re  welcomed—they  should  find,  ‘‘We  need  to  do  this 
careful  screening,  but  we  also  welcome  you  into  in  our  country.’’ 
Even  though  it  might  not  change  any  specific  policy,  that  would 
make a huge difference in our ability to bring in talent. As the first 
agency  they  see  when  they  get  to  this  country,  or  as  the  first  con-
tact as they’re planning to go to this country—the immigration ma-
chinery  could  make  a  huge  difference  in  our  ability  to  attract  the 
best people. 

Senator PRYOR. Senator Klobuchar? 

STATEMENT OF HON. AMY KLOBUCHAR, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM MINNESOTA 

Senator  KLOBUCHAR.  Thank  you  for  coming.  Congratulations  on 
your accomplishments and your prize. I come here having the only 
prize I’ve ever won was Ms. Skyway News of March 1988. 

[Laughter.] 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:23 Mar 19, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00033 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\79907.TXT JACKIE

30 

Senator KLOBUCHAR. So, I’m in your league, as you can see. 
[Laughter.] 
Senator  KLOBUCHAR.  I  wanted  to  talk  to  you.  I  come  from  Min-
nesota,  where  we  believe  in  science,  the  home  of  the  Mayo  Clinic, 
and the University of Minnesota, and I appreciated what you were 
saying  about  stem  cell  research.  We’ve  actually  lost  some  people 
from  the  University  of  Minnesota  to  Europe  because  of  the  limita-
tions on the research. I also was listening to you—Dr. Smoot, about 
the  immigration  issue.  I’ve  had  the  CEO  of  Medtronic  from  Min-
nesota tell me how it was getting difficult for them because of these 
issues  and  things.  When  graduate  students  were  in,  that  they 
wanted to keep on, that they had some issues in trying to do that. 
So,  I  think  that’s  something  that  cries  out  for  comprehensive  re-
form. 

I  wanted  to  ask  a  little  bit  about  our  own  education  system.  I 
have  a  daughter  who’s  11,  and  is  actually  in  Mark’s  daughter’s 
class,  and  I’ve  seen  some  good  science  going  on  in  the  Arlington 
public  schools  in  Virginia.  I  wonder  what  you  think  needs  to  be 
done  with  our  public  schools  to  get  us  into  the  direction  so  we  can 
have more Americans sitting at a table, like you are today. 

Dr. MATHER. I’d like to address that question, just for a moment. 
We,  as  a  nation—indeed,  as  a  species—really,  the  most  important 
thing we do is pass knowledge to the next generation. And as a de-
mocracy,  this  is  incredibly  important.  We,  as  a  people,  have  to 
make  ethical  decisions  related  to  technology,  things  like  stem  cell 
research,  and  we  need  to  have  people  who  understand  the  science 
involved  so  that  they  can  make  informed  decisions  about  whether 
it’s  ethical  or  not.  For  example,  I  have  a  6-year-old  who  has  type 
I diabetes, and, you know, it’s—it really brings home, when you or 
a loved one has a disease that could be treated with stem cell biol-
ogy, for example, the importance of exploring these, and sometimes 
very  complex  ethical  issues.  I’m  not  taking  a  position,  beyond  say-
ing that it’s extremely important that we educate our young people 
so that ultimately we’ll have citizens who can make informed deci-
sions  about  the  future  of  this  country.  And  we’re  not  doing  a  very 
good job of that. 

In my state, we have Proposition 21⁄2, where we cannot levy more 
than  21⁄2 percent  each  year  on  our  property  taxes.  Just  yesterday, 
we  took  a  vote  in  our  local  elections,  and,  despite  extreme  efforts 
to  organize  the  ‘‘yes’’  vote,  we  failed  to  produce  an  override.  Con-
sequently,  our  schools,  in  the  midst  of  a  diabetes  and  obesity  epi-
demic,  are  now  charging  our  young  people  at  least  $225—this  is 
going to go up—to participate in track. So, we have kids who want 
to  run,  and  then—and  now  we’re  charging  them  extra  money  to 
participate in track. We’re going to cut freshman athletics. We have 
a  fifth-grade  study  hall.  And  this  is  happening  all  over  the  state, 
because—I  know,  I  was  deeply  involved  in  this  organization.  I’m 
heartbroken  today  to  have  to  be  here,  you  know,  not  having  that 
success  behind  us.  But  I’m  also  energized,  because  we  need  to  re-
double our efforts to fix this problem on a national level, on a State 
level, on a local level. It’s going to take, you know, efforts on every 
level.  And  we’re  certainly  energized  in  our  state,  in  our  local  and 
our town of Shrewsbury, Massachusetts, to do what we can for our 
young  people.  They’re  the  future.  And  let’s  face  it,  we’re  not  hand-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:23 Mar 19, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00034 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\79907.TXT JACKIE

31 

ing them a very certain future, we’re handing them a future that’s 
very  uncertain—I  think,  much  more  so  than  when  we  were  young 
people. And we need to prepare them for that uncertain future, and 
we need to see that they have a great education. I don’t have a so-
lution, unfortunately. 

Senator KLOBUCHAR. OK. 
Anyone else? 
Dr.  SMOOT.  I  actually  spend  a  fair  amount  of  my  time  and  some 
of  my  resources  and  have  been  doing  for  many  years,  but  now 
boosted  by  having  the  Nobel  Prize,  I’m  trying  to  address  this  edu-
cation problem. Along with one of my colleagues, I am trying to cre-
ate  a  teachers  academy  for  middle-  and  high-school  science  teach-
ers,  and  to  couple  that  with  a  program  (a  new  program  in  Cali-
fornia),  which  is  encouraging  people  to  get  a  double  degree  in 
science  and  in  education  so  they  can  become  high-school  and  mid-
dle-school  science  teachers  or  math  teachers.  It’s  absolutely  essen-
tial that we bring in quality teachers, and we get them to be enthu-
siastic,  and  keep  them  connected  to  the  science  enterprise  so  that 
they  share  the  excitement  and  the  enthusiasm  that  they  have  for 
the subject to their students. That will help bring them along. And 
those  students  may  not  become  scientists,  they  may  become  engi-
neers,  they  may  become  computer  scientists  or  whatever  else,  but 
they’re the technological backbone of what the society will be. Right 
now,  the  short-term  solution  is,  we’ve  got  to  import;  the  long-term 
solution  is  we  have  to  bring  our  K  through  12,  and  then  beyond, 
education up to the world’s standards. Right? You notice we’re 26th 
now. So—— 

Senator  KLOBUCHAR.  Right.  I  was  just  thinking  of  what  Dr. 
Mello had said. I decided that we had a breakthrough at our home 
last  night.  My  daughter,  the  science  she  had  before  she  came  to 
this  school  wasn’t  as  strong,  and  last  night,  after  living  through 
Mrs. Migurca, she goes, ‘‘Mom, I think what Mrs. Migurca’s saying 
is  starting  to  make  sense,  it  has  everyday  application  in  my  life.’’ 

[Laughter.] 
Senator  KLOBUCHAR.  And  then  she  proceeded  to  talk  about  how 
many  times  we  flush  the  toilet  and  that  we  were  wasting  water. 
But, in any case—— 

[Laughter.] 
Senator  KLOBUCHAR.  I  think  that  what  I  was  saying,  what  Dr. 
Mello said, beyond graduating better students that go into science, 
I  think  that  it’s  going  to  give  them  a  better  understanding  of 
issues, like climate change and things like that, that’s going to help 
them, whether they go into science or not, and then understanding 
stem cell research and some of these other issues. 

My  last  question  would  be  this.  I  understand  I’m  the  only  thing 
that  divides  you  between  this  hearing  and  going  to  the  White 
House,  so  we  don’t  want  the  98th  most-senior  Senator  to  hold  you 
up on that journey, but—— 

[Laughter.] 
Senator  KLOBUCHAR.—I  just  wondered,  the  U.S.  used  to  rely  on 
major  labs,  financed  labs—like  AT&T  and  General  Electric  and 
IBM,  to  do  a  lot  of  our  research  and  these  national  labs  no  longer 
exist.  I’m  just  wondering  if  you  think  that  DOE-supported  labs  at 
Los  Alamos,  other  places,  can  serve  as  a  replacement  for  these  in-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:23 Mar 19, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00035 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\79907.TXT JACKIE

32 

dustrial  labs,  or  if  you  think  that  we  should  be  looking  at  other 
routes, as well. 

Dr.  SMOOT.  I  have  a  joint  appointment  between  the  Lawrence 
Berkeley  National  Lab,  which  is  a  DOE  lab,  and  the  University  of 
California.  That  system  works  extremely  well,  having  a  national 
lab  with  cross-cutting  professors  who  are  in  both  places.  We  have 
about 200 to 300—I think 280—professors with joint appointments, 
along  with  a  tremendous  influx  of  students  and  postdocs.  It  keeps 
everyone  refreshed,  and  it  keeps  science  on  track.  The  national 
labs,  particularly  the  DOE  labs,  serve  as  a  reservoir  of  basic 
science knowledge, but you also have NSF facilities and NASA cen-
ters that play important roles or more specific roles. When a crisis 
comes, like the energy crisis (of course, DOE is now Department of 
Energy,  but  it  wasn’t  originally)  or,  in  this  case,  in  the  biological 
sciences, Dr. Kornberg used the facilities in order to do that—they 
are  certainly  very  important  as  a  resource  of  talent  and  facilities. 
There are a lot of national labs in the country. Are they all effec-
tive?  Perhaps  they  could  be  restructured  in  some  cases.  But,  in 
fact,  they  create  a  combination  of  basic  research  in  universities 
which  is  extremely  important.  That’s  where  the  next  generation 
will come from. It’s where many good ideas originate. The expertise 
that  exists  in  the  national  labs  and  centers,  along  with  the  ability 
to  take  on  big  projects  and  resolve  important  issues  as  they  arise 
in  the  country.  So  we  must  do  that.  It’s  unfortunate  regarding  the 
economics,  as  in  the  case  of  Bell  Labs.  Since  Bell  was  a  monopoly, 
it  could  take  part  of  its  regulated  money  in  order  to  support  this 
national  laboratory.  Also,  when  IBM  was  a  very  rich  and  powerful 
company  it  could  invest  in  the  future.  As  the  world  economic  cli-
mate  changes,  those  things  drop  out,  and  it’s  really  the  Federal 
Government  that  has  the  primary  role  of  doing  basic  research. 
When it comes to applied research, the higher you go up the chain, 
the  closer  to  applications,  the  more  the  technology  should  transfer 
over into the private sector. 

Senator KLOBUCHAR. OK. Anyone else? 
Thank you very much. 
Senator  PRYOR.  I  want  to  thank  you  all  for  being  here.  Before  I 
cut  you  loose,  I  want  to  say  that  it’s  really  been  an  honor  to  have 
you  here.  And  what  we’d  like  to  do  is,  every  year,  have  a  panel  of 
the  three  winners—the  three  Nobel  Laureates.  And  so,  my  last 
question is, do y’all have predictions for who will—— 

[Laughter.] 
Senator  PRYOR.—win  next  time?  We  need  to  get  our  invitations 
out  for  next  year.  So—seriously,  do  y’all  have  any  predictions  on 
any great stuff that’s going on out there, either in medicine, chem-
istry, or physics? Is there a favorite out there? I know it’s not quite 
like the Kentucky Derby, but—— 

[Laughter.] 
Dr. MATHER. I think we have to plead the Fifth on that and take 

Senator PRYOR. OK. 
Dr.  SMOOT.  We  also  have  a  role  that  we  get,  also,  to  be  nomi-

a—— 

nators. 

Senator KLOBUCHAR. Oh. 
Dr. SMOOT. Right? So—— 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:23 Mar 19, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00036 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\79907.TXT JACKIE

33 

Senator KLOBUCHAR. You’re crossing protocol—— 
Senator PRYOR. So, it’s like the Academy Awards. 
Senator KLOBUCHAR.—here, Senator. 
Dr. SMOOT. So, we have to be careful about what we say. 
Senator  PRYOR.  So,  it’s  like  the  Academy  Awards.  Once  you  win 

the Oscar, for life you get—— 

[Laughter.] 
Dr. SMOOT. You get a chance to put in—— 
Senator PRYOR. Wow. 
Dr.  SMOOT.  Well,  it’s  a  very  complicated  procedure  but  you  can 
propose  people  to  be  actually  nominated.  It’s  called  ‘‘nominating,’’ 
but  it  goes  to  a  Committee  after  that,  which  then  decides  whether 
to present cases and so forth. 

Senator  PRYOR.  Well,  we’d  like  to  put  in  a  word  for  Minnesota 

and Arkansas. 

Dr. SMOOT. Right. 
[Laughter.] 
Senator PRYOR. Listen—— 
Senator KLOBUCHAR. Thank you. 
Senator  PRYOR.—thank  you  all  for  being  here.  And  I  think  we 
may want to do a very quick photo. Senator Klobuchar, if you want 
to join in that—— 

Senator KLOBUCHAR. Sure. 
Senator  PRYOR.—that  would  be  great.  And  then  we’ll  let  you  go. 
Thank you very, very much. 
[Whereupon, at 5:17 p.m., the hearing was adjourned.] 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:23 Mar 19, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00037 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\79907.TXT JACKIE

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:23 Mar 19, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00038 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\79907.TXT JACKIE

A P P E N D I X 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF HON. DANIEL K. INOUYE, U.S. SENATOR FROM HAWAII 
Science  is  the  basis  of  human  progress.  This  field  of  knowledge  allows  us  to  un-
derstand the world around us and to continually transform and improve our quality 
of  life.  Today’s  essential  technologies,  such  as  mobile  phones  and  air  travel,  are 
based  on  our  understanding  and  mastering  of  scientific  concepts  like  the  electro-
magnetic spectrum and aerodynamics. 

Since  the  Industrial  Revolution,  the  United  States  has  reaped  the  benefits  of  our 
investment  in  scientific  research.  American  scientists  have  been  at  the  forefront  of 
discoveries  that  have  changed  the  world.  Barbara  McClintock  observed  the  trans-
position of genes, breaking new ground in molecular genetics. 

John  Von  Neumann’s  work  in  mathematical  logic  laid  the  foundation  for  com-
puters.  And  Richard  Feynman  expanded  the  theory  of  quantum  electrodynamics. 
These  are  just  a  few  examples  of  the  American  scientific  contribution  to  world 
knowledge. 

Our  panel  today  reflects  a  cross-section  of  America’s  exceptional  scientific  leader-
ship. This team represents a complete sweep of the 2006 scientific Nobel prizes, for 
the  first  time  in  more  than  20  years,  an  impressive  and  well  deserved  accomplish-
ment. Their hard work and persistence are largely responsible for this achievement. 
At  the  same  time,  I  am  sure  our  distinguished  witnesses  would  agree  that  some 
credit  is  due  to  the  American  scientific  enterprise.  Our  strong  educational  system 
and research infrastructure lies at the heart of this enterprise. 

For  decades  our  nation,  which  accounts  for  only  6  percent  of  the  world’s  popu-
lation,  has  produced  more  than  20  percent  of  the  world’s  doctorates  in  science  and 
engineering. 

However,  our  system  is  in  jeopardy.  The  National  Academies’  Rising  Above  the 
Gathering Storm report warns that the Nation is at risk of falling behind our inter-
national competition. According to the 2006 National Science Board Science and En-
gineering  Indicators,  78  percent  of  science  and  engineering  doctorates  are  earned 
outside  of  the  United  States.  Almost  half  of  the  masters  degrees  awarded  in  com-
puter science in this country went to foreign students. 

We  must  take  corrective  action  to  ensure  the  United  States  does  not  lose  ground 
in  science  and  technology.  Just  last  week  the  Senate  passed  S.  761,  the  America 
COMPETES Act. The legislation received 88 votes in the Senate. 

That  strong  showing  reflects  how  united  this  body  is  in  recognizing  the  need  to 
bolster the Nation’s competitiveness. The bill calls for reinvestment in our scientific 
endeavor  through  increased  funding  for  the  National  Science  Foundation,  the  Na-
tional Institute of Standards and Technology, and the Department of Energy’s Office 
of  Science.  S.  761  also  encourages  broader  participation  in  the  science,  technology, 
engineering,  and  mathematics  fields,  particularly  by  women  and  underrepresented 
minorities. 

The  accomplishments  of  this  panel  are  impressive,  and  if  we  are  hoping  to  rep-
licate  their  achievement  20  years  hence,  the  United  States  must  seek  continuous 
improvement  in  our  science  enterprise.  I  look  forward  to  incorporating  the  rec-
ommendations of this esteemed panel into our legislative work this Congress. 

RESPONSE TO WRITTEN QUESTIONS SUBMITTED BY HON. MARK PRYOR TO 

DR. ROGER KORNBERG 

Question 1. You spoke about the challenge of funding basic research and the lack 
of  risk-taking  on  the  part  of  our  Federal  agencies.  The  NIH  budget  doubled  in  the 
5-years  from  Fiscal  Year  1999  through  2003  but  has  remained  flat  since  then.  The 
percentage  of  first  time  applicants  for  NIH  investigator  initiated  grants  has  been 
steadily falling. We see the same problem at the National Science Foundation where 
new  investigators  have  a  lower  success  rate  than  overall  NSF  grant  applications. 

(35) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:23 Mar 19, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00039 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\79907.TXT JACKIE

36 

Can  you  describe  some  of  the  benefits  to  scientific  discovery  directly  related  to  the 
doubling of the NIH budget and what will be the impact of the recent flat funding? 
Answer. The doubling of the NIH budget elicited a remarkable response from the 
private sector. There was a surge in philanthropic contributions to universities and 
research  institutes  for  the  construction  of  new  facilities  for  basic  biomedical  re-
search, to be staffed by new young faculty who are the driving force behind scientific 
discovery.  The  stage  was  set  for  an  explosion  in  precisely  the  sort  of  new  informa-
tion  from  which  important  new  drugs  and  medical  procedures  are  derived.  The  re-
cent flat funding has undercut the promise of this truly exciting and crucially impor-
tant development. The partnership between government and the private sector is in 
crisis.  Not  only  have  the  new  investigators  gone  largely  unfunded,  and  in  many 
cases driven from the field, but superb established investigators at the peak of their 
powers  are  finding  it  difficult,  sometimes  impossible,  to  continue  with  their  work. 
Question 2. What steps can the Federal Government take to ensure that high-risk, 

high-reward research is funded? 

Answer. Two steps are critically important. First, a level of NIH funding commen-
surate  with  the  doubling  should  be  reestablished  and  increased  as  in  the  years  be-
fore  the  doubling,  to  enable  the  natural  growth  of  biomedical  science.  Without 
growth  there  is  no  entry  of  the  new  young  scientists,  trained  in  established  labora-
tories,  and  most  creative  in  their  early  years  as  independent  investigators.  Second, 
and  no  less  important,  NIH  should  be  directed  to  devote  most  funds  to  individual 
investigator-initiated  (RO1)  grants,  and  discouraged  from  funding  targeted  toward 
specific diseases and funding of large programs targeted toward specific lines of re-
search.  History  has  shown  that  RO1  grants  are  the  wellspring  of  discovery,  while 
targeted programs are less productive or fail. 

Question  3.  How  do  we  reconcile  highly  innovative,  potentially  transformative  re-

search with the peer review process for awarding grants? 

Answer.  Peer  review  works  well  when  funding  levels  are  adequate,  and  breaks 
down  when  funding  is  cut.  The  reason  is  that  ‘‘highly  innovative,  potentially  trans-
formative  research’’  is  risky.  Review  panels  become  more  conservative  when  funds 
are limited, and avoid all risk. 

Question 4. Would programs similar to the NIH Director’s Pioneer Award Grants 

work in other agencies? 

Answer. The NIH Director’s Pioneer Award Grants should be discontinued. To ex-
tend this approach to other agencies would be a terrible mistake. The NIH Director 
himself  is  superb.  The  Pioneer  Award  Grants,  however,  and  also  the  programs  tar-
geted toward specific lines of research, undercut the proven, peer review-based RO1 
approach. Those who have received a disproportionate share of funding through the 
Pioneer  Award  program  are  no  more  capable  and  no  more  likely  to  produce  impor-
tant discoveries than those who have not received these awards. The Pioneer Award 
and other such programs cause harm by depriving many dedicated, deserving inves-
tigators of needed support. 

Æ 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:23 Mar 19, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00040 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6611 S:\GPO\DOCS\79907.TXT JACKIE

